<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89602-0024 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-02-89.f2.A1023</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 105 / Friday, June 2, 1989 / Rulesand Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3557-6]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 122, 123 and 130</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System; Surface Water ToxicsControl Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final Rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Today's action amends Parts 122, 123, and 130 of EPA'sregulations. The regulations clarify EPA's surface water toxics controlprogram, and incorporate section 308(a) of the Water Quality Act of 1987into EPA's toxics control program. Section 308(a) of the Water QualityAct added section 304(l) to the Clean Water Act (hereafter referred toas section 304(l)). Section 304(l) requires the states to identify thosewaters that are adversely affected by toxic, conventional, and nonconventionalpollutants, and requires the states to prepare individual control strategiesthat will control point source discharges of toxic pollutants. The statesmust submit lists of waters and individual control strategies to EPA forreview, and if EPA disapproves a state's decision with respect to a listor an individual control strategy, then EPA must implement the requirementsof section 304(l) in cooperation with the state. EPA and the states mustaccomplish the tasks in section 304(l) according to an ambitious seriesof deadlines. Today's regulations will strengthen State and Federal controlsover discharges to toxic pollutants, and will assist EPA and the statesin satisfying the requirements of section 304(l) of the CWA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>These regulations shall be effective on May 26,1989 at 1:00 p.m. Eastern Daylight Savings Time. In accordance with 40CFR 23.2, EPA hereby specifies that these regulations shall be consideredfinal agency action for purposes of judicial review at 1:00 p.m. EasternDaylight Savings Time on May 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Paul Connor, Program DevelopmentBranch, Office of Water Enforcement and Permits, (EN-336), U.S. EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460, (202) 475-9537,or Judith Leckrone, Assessment and Watershed Protection Division, Officeof Water Regulations and Standards, (WH-553), U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460, (202) 382-7056. The Publicrecord for this regulation is available at the EPA library, M2904, U.S.Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25</C><T4>Preamble Outline</T4><H1> </H1>I. AuthorityII. Background<ITAG tagnum="12">A. Biennial Submission of Lists Under section 303(d) and section 305(b)of the CWA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">B. EPA's Surface Water Toxics Control Program </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">C. Section 304(l) and its Relationship to EPA's Surface Water ToxicsControl Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">D. Purpose and Summary of Today's Regulations</ITAG>III. Section-by-Section Analysis<ITAG tagnum="12">A. Changes to the National Surface Water Toxics Control Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Amendments to 40 CFR 122.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. A Definition for Whole Effluent Toxicity</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Narrative Water Quality Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Developing Water Quality-Based Effluent Limits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">d. Technology-Based Controls for Toxic Pollutants</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. State NPDES Program Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">B. Identification of Waters</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Description of the Four Lists</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. Explanation of Terms Used in section 304(l)(1)(B)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Applicable Standard</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Due Entirely or Substantially to Discharges from Point Sources</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">3. Preparation and Review of the Lists</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Use of Existing and Readily Available Data</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Documentation of Data and Methodologies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Review of Lists By EPA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">C. Individual Control Strategies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Description of an Individual Control Strategy</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Types of Controls</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. EPA's Point Source-Based Approach</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Approval of Permits that are Not Yet Effective</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">d. CERCLA Sites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">e. Non-Approved States</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. Technical Review Criteria</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">D. EPA Review of Lists and Individual Control Strategies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">1. Partial Approval and Disapproval of State Submittals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">2. Public Participation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. Contents of EPA's Notice of Approval or Disapproval</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Public Hearings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">c. Petitions for Additional Listings</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">d. Response to Comments and Petitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">3. Subsequent steps in the 304(l) Process</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">a. EPA Implementation of andSection; 304(l)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="14">b. Judicial Review of Decisions Under andSection; 304(l)</ITAG>IV. Effective DateV. Regulatory Analysis<ITAG tagnum="12">A. Executive Order 12291</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">B. Paperwork Reduction Act</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">C. Regulatory Flexibility Act</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority</ITAG>These regulations are issued under the authority of the Clean Water Act,33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background</ITAG>EPA's surface water toxics control program uses several key terms. Forthe convenience of the reader and for the purposes of this preamble, theseterms are described as follows:``Narrative standard'' refers to a narrative water quality criterion adoptedby a state under section 303(c) of the Clean Water Act. All states haveadopted a narrative criterion that prohibits the discharge of toxic pollutantsin toxic amounts.``Priority pollutant'' refers to the 126 pollutants listed in AppendixA to (40 CFR Part 423.) The 126 priority pollutants are derived from the65 classes of compounds listed at 40 CFR andSection; 401.15.``Toxic pollutant'' means any pollutant listed as toxic under section 307(a)(1)of the CWA. EPA has listed 65 classes of compounds under section 307(a)(1)of the CWA, and these 65 classes are listed at 40 CFR andSection; 401.15.``Toxics'' refers to any pollutant or combination of pollutants which causestoxicity to aquatic life or terrestrial life, or causes adverse human healthimpacts.``Whole effluent toxicity'' means the aggregate toxic effect of an effluentmeasured directly with a toxicity test. A toxicity test measures the degreeof response to an exposed test organism to a specific chemical or effluent.Like biochemical oxygen demand (BOD), which is also a biological measurement,toxicity can be limited in an NPDES permit.A. Biennial Submission of Lists Under Section 303(d) and Section 305(b)of the CWAMany commenters objected to the additional reporting requirements suggestedby EPA's proposal to require a biennial submission of lists under sections303(d) and 305(b) of the CWA. Most expressed confusion about the extentto which the proposed requirements overlapped with and related to the section304(l) listing process. Due to this confusion, EPA has decided not to amendthe Part 130 regulations in today's rule to include these biennial submissions.Rather, EPA will extend the comment period on this part of the proposalin order to take the necessary time to consider all implications that theproposed amendments might have for the entire section 303(d) reportingand TMDL development program. In the near future EPA will extend the commentperiod in a separate action in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>B. EPA's Surface Water Toxics Control ProgramEPA has described its surface water toxics control program in several documents.These descriptions are not repeated here, but the reader is referred tothese documents for more information on EPA's approach for controllingdischarges of toxic pollutants. On March 9, 1984, EPA published a documentcalled ``Development of Water Quality-Based Permit Limitations for ToxicPollutants: National Policy'' 49 FR 9016 (1984). The policy emphasizesEPA's integrated approach in the NPDES permit program for assessing andcontrolling the discharge of toxic pollutants to the nation's surface waters.Two preambles to EPA's rulemakings also describe EPA's surface water toxicscontrol strategy. The preamble to EPA's NPDES regulations (45 FR 33520(1980)) emphasizes that NPDES permits must contain limitations reflectingthe most stringent of technology-based or water quality-based controlsfor toxic pollutants. The second preamble discussion (49 FR 37998 (1984))emphasizes the need to establish effluent limitations in NPDES permitsto control toxic pollutants. The preamble to the 1984 regulations alsodescribes several regulations in Part 122 that require dischargers to identifyand report the presence of toxic pollutants in discharges.EPA's existing regulations also reflect the Agency's surface water toxicscontrol strategy. Part 131 of EPA's regulations describes the process fordeveloping, reviewing, revising, and approving state water quality standards.Part 122 describes the NPDES permit regulations. These regulations currentlyrequire NPDES permits to establish limitations, standards, and conditionsnecessary to achieve water quality standards, or to attain and maintainspecified water quality through effluent limits. Part 125 provides criteriaand standards for imposing technology-based treatment requirements, includingthe control of toxic pollutants. Part 129 contains effluent standards forcertain toxic pollutants, and Part 130 describes EPA's program for identifyingwaters affected by toxic pollutants.EPA has also developed standard procedures, policies, and guidance documentsnecessary to support the toxics control program. The ``Water Quality StandardsHandbook,'' (October 1983), describes how to develop water quality standardsand describes the procedures that a state should follow in adopting waterquality standards. (The Handbook is available from the Criteria and StandardsDivision (WH-585), U.S. EPA, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460.) Twoimportant guidance documents that support EPA's toxics control programare the ``Technical Support Document for Water Quality-Based Toxics Control,''(TSD), EPA 440/4-85-032, September, 1985, and the ``Permit Writer's Guideto Water Quality-Based Permitting,'' EPA 440/4-87-005, July, 1987. (Bothdocuments are available from the Permitting Division (EN-336), U.S. EPA,401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC, 20460.) The Technical Support Document(TSD) provides a detailed technical explanation of biological and chemicaltechniques to assess and control toxic pollutants and toxicity. The TSDexplains how to assess aquatic toxicity and how to calculate the risk tohuman health of an effluent, explains wasteload allocation modeling, andexplains the equations for deriving water quality-based effluent limits.The Permit Writer's Guide gives state and EPA NPDES permit writers a step-by-stepmethodology for deriving water quality-based effluent limits for toxicpollutants and toxicity.C. Section 304(l) and Its Relationship to EPA's Surface Water Toxics ControlProgramSection 304(l) of the CWA reinforces EPA's on-going program to identifyand control discharges of toxics. Under section 304(l) the state's deadlinefor submitting the four lists to EPA for review and approval was February4, 1989. The statutory language of section 304(l) requires the listingof waters for which water quality standards will not be achieved due ``** * to discharges from point sources of any toxic pollutants listed pursuantto section 307(a); * * *.'' The toxic pollutants identified under section307(a) of the CWA are 65 categories and classes of pollutants that caninclude thousands of compounds. EPA's water quality criteria and effluentguidelines focus on a list of 126 ``priority pollutants'' which are common,widely present chemicals for which toxicological data are available. Therefore,EPA will address the 126 priority pollutants when describing the regulatoryrequirements governing the control of toxic pollutants under section 304(l)of the CWA.The four lists required by section 304(l) are described as follows, andare identified by their corresponding paragraphs in section 304(l)(1):1. (A)(i)_A list of those waters in the state which, after applicationof technology-based effluent limits, cannot reasonably be anticipated toattain or maintain water quality standards for priority pollutants adoptedunder section 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA;2. (A)(ii)_A list of all waters which, after application of technology-basedeffluent limits, cannot reasonably be anticipated to attain or maintainthat water quality which shall assure protection of public health, publicwater supplies, agricultural and industrial uses, and the protection andpropagation of a balanced population of shellfish, fish and wildlife, andallow recreational activities in and on the water;3. (B)_A list of those waters which, after application of technology-basedeffluent limits, the state does not expect will achieve applicable waterquality standards, due entirely or substantially to point source dischargesof priority pollutants;4. (C)_A list of the point sources of the priority pollutants which arebelieved to be preventing or impairing water quality for waters on the(B) list, and the amount of each priority pollutant discharged by eachpoint source.In addition to the listing requirements under section 304(l)(1), the statesmust prepare an individual control strategy (ICS) for each point sourceon the (C) list. (The definition of an ICS is discussed in more detailin section III.C of this preamble.) An ICS must require reductions in thedischarge of priority pollutants from point sources on the (C) list, whichreductions are sufficient, in combination with existing controls on pointand nonpoint sources of pollution, to achieve applicable water qualitystandards as soon as possible but not later than three years after establishmentof the ICS. Where EPA approves a state submittal, the deadline for complianceis as soon as possible but not later than June 4, 1992. Where EPA disapprovesa state submittal and promulgates an ICS in lieu of the state, the deadlinefor compliance is as soon as possible but not later than June 4, 1993.All ICSs were due to EPA, from states approved by EPA to administer theNPDES program, by February 4, 1989. EPA must approve or disapprove thelists and ICSs by June 4, 1989. When EPA disapproves an ICS, EPA must implementsection 304(l)(1) ``in cooperation with such state and after notice andopportunity for public comment,'' by June 4, 1990.An approved state's obligation to prepare and submit an ICS to EPA is similarto an approved NPDES state's obligation to prepare NPDES permits and submitthe permits to EPA for review. However, section 304(l) establishes newdeadlines and procedures for issuing and reviewing some NPDES permits.(Many NPDES permits are not subject to section 304(l). Permits that arenot subject to section 304(l) should receive the same priority for reissuanceor oversight that the permits would receive regardless of section 304(l).)Today's proposed rulemaking is one of several EPA actions to implementsection 304(l). In March 1988, EPA issued guidance entitled ``Implementationof Requirements Under section 304(l) of the Clean Water Act, as Amended''(March, 1988). (EPA published a notice of availability for the guidanceon March 18, 1988, and the document is available by writing to the PermitsDivision, Office of Water (EN-336), U.S. Environmental Protection Agency,401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460.)EPA has promulgated a final interpretive rule that incorporated into EPA'sregulations and provisions of the WQA relating to the NPDES program andsection 304(l), 54 FR 246 (1989). The rule codified the statutory requirementsof paragraphs (A), (B), and (C) of section 304(l) into 40 CFR andSection;130.10(d).The rule also codified section 304(l)(1)(D) and andSection;andSection;304 (1)(2)and (3) into 40 CFR andSection;123.46. These new paragraphs describe therequirement that states submit lists of waters and individual control strategiesto EPA for review. Today's rulemaking re-promulgates andSection;123.46(a)of the January 4, 1989 interpretive rule. EPA is re-promulgating this paragraphwith changes that reflect more clearly EPA's interpretation of section304(l)(1)(D). See section III. C for further discussion of this paragraph.Today's final regulations supplement the Janauary 4, 1989 interpretativerule by defining key terms in section 304(l) and describing Federal andstate responsibilities under section 304(l).D. Purpose and Summary of Today's RegulationsThe purpose of today's rules is to reinforce EPA's surface water toxicscontrol program, and to specify in more detail the requirements of section304(l). Section 304(l) does not change the direction of EPA's surface watertoxics control program, but rather, establishes ambitious deadlines bywhich EPA and the states must identify and control priority pollutants.While EPA's toxics control policies require control of all toxic pollutants,including but not limited to toxicity and the priority pollutants, theWQA reflects Congress' intent that priority pollutants be addressed ona rapid schedule. After the deadlines of section 304(l) pass, EPA and thestates must continue the toxics control program by determining the presenceof toxic pollutants in effluents and receiving waters, developing the necessarypolicies and regulations to control toxic pollutants and toxicity, andestablishing effluent limits in permits.EPA received a number of comments suggesting that the thirty day commentpeirod allowed for this rule was too short. Although EPA has consideredall comments received, it remains convinced that thirty days was a sufficientcomment period for the following reasons. The principal components of therule were publicly available before the proposal, in particular the majorityof the section 304(l) requirements were a part of the guidance that wasmade available for public comment. In addition, EPA provided speakers tointerested groups regarding the rule several months before proposal, andsolicited comments on the development of the proposal. Furthermore, boththe proposal and the administrative record were short and not overly technical.The administrative record supporting the proposal was made up of documentsthat have been not only publicly available, but also in practical use forsome time. In short, the proposal did not present a great number of novel,complex or technical issues requiring a lengthly comment period. Giventhat EPA believes that a thirty day comment period was adequate, EPA decidednot to extend the comment period because of the short amount of time inwhich EPA wished to finalize the rule.EPA received a number of comments that are not addressed in this preamble.A separate summary of these comments and the Agency's response to themis included in the administrative record for this rulemaking.Today's regulations amend three parts of the CFR. Changes to EPA's surfacewater toxics control program are located in Parts 122 and 123 of the CFR.Part 130 incorporates the proposed regulations for listing waters undersection 304(l)(1) (A)-(C), and the proposed regulations for individualcontrol strategies prepared under section 304(l) and located in Part 123.1. Changes to 40 CFR Part 122:Today's regulations add a definition for whole effluent toxicity to andSection;122.2.EPA is also adding seven paragraphs to andSection;122.44(d)(1). The new languagedescribes the procedures the permitting authority shall use to determinewhether an NPDES permit must include a water quality-based effluent limit.The proposed regulations also address the procedures for deriving effluentlimits from state narrative or numeric water quality criteria. EPA is alsochanging the title to paragraph (e) of andSection;122.44 to clarify thatparagraph (e) applies to technology-based controls.2. Changes to 40 CFR Part 130:Today's regulations amend Part 130 to incorporate the listing requirementsof section 304(l)(1). The regulations also establish procedures for EPA'sreview and approval or disapproval of the lists prepared under section304(l). These regulations are described in sections III.B and III.D ofthis preamble.The proposed regulations included a requirement for a biennial submissionof lists under sections 303(d) and 305(b) of the CWA. EPA deleted theserequirements from today's final regulations. Many commenters objected tothe additional reporting requirements suggested by the proposed regulations.Other commenters were confused about the extent to which the proposed requirementsoverlapped with and related to the section 304(l) listing process. Dueto these comments EPA has decided to address these biennial reporting requirementsin a separate action. 3. Changes to 40 CFR Part 123: The additions to Part 123 establish procedures for EPA's approval and disapprovalof the ICSs prepared under section 304(l). Today's rules provide for publicparticipation in reviewing the ICSs, and also establish the criteria EPAwill use to evaluate the adequacy of ICSs. These regulations are discussedmore fully in sections III.C and III.D of this preamble. Finally, EPA isplacing an additional criterion for NPDES state program withdrawal in 40CFR Part 123. These regulations are described in section III.A of thispreamble. EPA believes that today's rules and preamble will assist the states andthe public at large in developing a better understanding of the nationalsurface water toxics control program. Today's rulemaking will also ensurethat the activities carried out under section 304(l) will be consistentwith EPA's statutory obligations and national policy for controlling toxicpollutants and whole effluent toxicity. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Section-By-Section Analysis</ITAG>This section discusses today's regulations in four parts. Part A describesregulations that amend and clarify EPA's existing surface water toxicscontrol program. Part B describes the requirements for identifying andlisting waterbodies under paragraph 1 of andSection; 304(l). Part C discussesthe requirements for preparing and reviewing ICSs, and Part D discussesthe procedures for reviewing and approving or disapproving the lists andICSs. A. Changes to the National Surface Water Toxics Control Program <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Amendments to 40 CFR 122.44</ITAG>Two of the most important components of EPA's surface water toxics controlprogram are the development and implementation of water quality-based permitlimits. The permitting authority (either EPA or a state approved by EPAto administer the NPDES program) uses water quality-based limits when effluentlimits more stringent than technology-based limits are necessary to attainor maintain water quality standards. Although sections 402(a)(1) and 301(b)(1)(C)of the CWA provide the authority to require NPDES permits to achieve theeffluent limits necessary to attain and maintain water quality standards,the existing NPDES regulations do not describe the procedures for developingwater quality-based effluent limits. This section explains today's regulationswhich describe procedures for developing water quality-based effluent limits.EPA uses an integrated approach to water quality-based permitting. Theintegrated approach includes both biological and chemical procedures forcharacterizing effluents and developing effluent limits. EPA's integratedapproach to water quality-based permitting is explained more fully in theTechnical Support Document and in EPA's National Policy of March 9, 1984which are described in section II.A of this preamble. EPA has issued detailed guidance on the integrated approach to water quality-basedpermitting. Although EPA's existing NPDES regulations provide adequateauthority to require water quality-based effluent limits in permits whenan excursion above a water quality criterion is either identified or projected,the existing regulations do not describe the procedures for developingsuch limits. Today's regulations establish minimum consistent proceduresfor the states, EPA, and the regulated community, to use in developingwater quality-based effluent limitations. <T3>a. A Definition for Whole Effluent Toxicity. </T3>Today's regulationsadd a definition for ``whole effluent toxicity'' to the definitions in40 CFR 122.2. Whole effluent toxicity is defined as the aggregate toxiceffect of an effluent measured directly with a toxicity test. A toxicitytest measures the degree of response of an exposed test organism to a chemicalor effluent. The proposed definition is the same definition used in theTSD and in the Permit Writer's Guide. EPA is promulgating a definition for whole effluent toxicity because controlsfor whole effluent toxicity are an essential component of EPA's integratedapproach to toxics control. Where controls on individual pollutants donot adequately protect water quality, assessing and controlling whole effluenttoxicity is necessary to reduce or eliminate the toxic impact of the effluent.A definition for the term will assist the public in better understandinghow controls on whole effluent toxicity are used in EPA's surface watertoxics control program. A limit on whole effluent toxicity refers to a numeric effluent limitationexpressed in terms such as toxic units, no observed effect level (NOEL),LC50, or percent mortality. Effluent limitations may be expressed as chronictoxicity or acute toxicity (or both). Regardless of how the numeric effluentlimitations for whole effluent toxicity are expressed, any single violationof the effluent limit is a violation of the NPDES permit and is subjectto the full range of state and Federal enforcement actions. Many commenters suggested that the definition for whole effluent toxicityis too vague, that the definition should describe a ``toxicity test,''or that EPA should publish maximum allowable water quality criterion fortoxicity. EPA is maintaining a broad definition of whole effluent toxicityfor several reasons. First, there are a variety of testing procedures thatmay be used to determine whole effluent toxicity. Although EPA has developedprotocols and guidance documents for performing toxicity tests, it wouldbe inappropriate to incorporate these documents into the definition becausethese protocols are recommended procedures, not mandatory procedures. Second,today's definition does not include a water quality criterion for toxicitybecause publishing a criterion for whole effluent toxicity is a processcarried out under section 304(a) of the CWA, and is therefore inappropriatefor this rulemaking. The reader should refer to the recommended valuesfor whole effluent toxicity that are described in the TSD. If EPA choosesto develop formal water quality criteria for toxicity, EPA will publishthe criteria pursuant to section 304(a) fo the CWA. Several commenters asked for clarification of the meaning of ``whole''in the term ``whole effluent toxicity.'' Commenters were concerned aboutwhether dilution of the effluent was precluded as a part of whole effluenttoxicity testing. The word ``whole'' in definition refers to the aggregatetoxicity of an effluent_not to 100% effluent. Percentages of effluentsin permit limits represent that concentration of the effluent which achievesstate water quality standards. Commenters also asked whether in-stream dilution would be considered indetermining whole effluent toxicity. These commenters asked if whole effluenttoxicity referred to the toxicity of an effluent at the ``end of the pipe,''or referred to in-stream toxicity of an effluent after mixing. These commentersare confusing the definition of whole effluent toxicity with the developmentand expression of a permit limit for whole effluent toxicity. Today's definitiondoes refer to ``end of the pipe'' toxicity because compliance with permitlimits is measured at that point. These end-of-pipe limitations are developedusing the state's water quality standards, including mixing zones (whereallowed) and wasteload allocations, to determine how much effluent toxicitymust be limited to attain and maintain applicable water quality standards.<T3>b. Narrative Water Quality Criteria. </T3>Today's regulations amendandSection; 122.44(d)(1). Existing paragraph (d) requires NPDES permits tocontain effluent limits more stringent than technology-based limits, wheremore stringent limits are necessary to ``achieve water quality standardsestablished under section 303 of the CWA.'' Today's regulations amend paragraph(d)(1) to clarify that effluent limits established under paragraph (d)must achieve any state narrative water quality criteria as well as numericwater quality criteria.EPA received no comments opposing this regulation, and therefore the agencyis promulgating this regulation without change from the proposed regulation.However, many commenters questioned EPA's use of narrative water qualitycriteria in the other amendments to andSection; 122.44(d)(1). For convenienceEPA is responding to these comments in the discussion of paragraph (1)(iv)of andSection; 122.44(d).<T3>c. Developing Water Quality-Based Effluent Limits. </T3>Today's rulemakingadds seven new subparagraphs to andSection; 122.44(d)(1). The subparagraphsdescribe the procedures for determining whether a discharge is causingor contributing to an excursion above a water quality criterion, identifythose permits that must have water quality-based effluent limits, and describeseveral principles for developing water quality-based effluent limits.The Agency has determined that additional clarification of andSection; 122.44(d)will assist in the implementation of the national water quality-based toxicscontrol program and the recommendations of EPA's national policy, 49 FR9016 (1984).The amendments to andSection; 122.44(d)(1) are intended to describe proceduresfor implementing existing state water quality standards and are not intendedto suggest that states change existing standards. Section 303(c)(2)(B)of the CWA, as amended, addresses state review and adoption of water qualitystandards for toxic pollutants listed pursuant to section 307(a)(1) ofthe CWA. EPA has prepared guidance on section 303(c)(2)(B) which is availablefrom: Criteria and Standards Division (WH-585), Office of Water, U.S. EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460.The first of the seven subparagraphs is paragraph (d)(1)(i). EPA originallyproposed this paragraph in andSection; 122.44(e)(2), but in placing thislanguage in andSection; 122.44(d)(1) in today's final regulations becausethe description of water quality-based controls is more appropriate forparagraph (d)(1). The subsequent six paragraphs are re-numbered (ii) through(vii).The new paragraph clarifies that an NPDES permit must limit any pollutantor pollutant parameter (whether conventional, nonconventional, or toxic),including whole effluent toxicity, that is or may be discharged at a levelthat causes, has the reasonable potential to cause, or contributes to anexcursion above any water quality criterion, including state narrativewater quality criteria. The new language clarifies that paragraph (d) appliesto any pollutant, whether conventional, nonconventional, toxic, or wholeeffluent toxicity, and applies to excursions above narrative water qualitycriteria, not just numeric criteria in state water quality standards.Some commenters asked for clarification of the phrase ``excursions aboveapplicable water quality standards'' and the role of effluent limitationsin preventing such excursions. Water quality criteria express water qualityobjectives for protecting aquatic life and human health and for meetinga defined level of water quality protection. Where a discharge has a reasonablepotential to cause or contribute to an excursion above a water qualitycriterion, effluent limitations are necessary to ensure that water qualitystandards will always be met. This connection is inherent in section 301(b)(1)(C)of the Clean Water Act which requires that water quality standards be achievedthrough effluent limitations.As used in today's regulation, ``excursion above'' refers to any projectedor actual concentration of a pollutant that is greater than the applicablewater quality criterion. For most water quality standards, an excursionoccurs if the projected or actual in-stream concentrations are numericallyhigher than the applicable criterion. In some cases, however, excursionsoccur if the ambient values are numerically lower than the criterion (e.g.,dissolved oxygen or pH). The phrase ``excursions above'' in today's regulationapplies to both cases.An ``excursion'' must also be consistent with the duration and frequencyof the applicable water quality standard. Duration refers to the periodof time over which the in-stream concentration is averaged for comparisionwith criteria concentrations, and frequency describes how often criteriacan be exceeded without impairing the designated use of the receiving water.An excursion above a water quality standard should account for these elementsof the standard.When referring to excursions, today's regulations use the term ``criteria''instead of ``standard'' because it is more accurate to refer to excursionsabove water quality criteria. Water quality criteria are the thresholdvalues against which ambient concentrations are compared to determine whethera waterbody exceeds the water quality standard.The new language will clarify that NPDES permits must establish limitson any pollutant, where necessary to attain and maintain applicable waterquality standards. The paragraph also emphasizes the importance of narrativewater quality standards. Today's regulations emphasize that narrative standardshave the same force and effect as other state water quality standards.Subparagraph (ii) of andSection; 122.44(d)(1) concerns the procedures fordetermining whether a discharge must have a water quality-based effluentlimit. EPA is promulgating this language without change except for thenew paragraph number. To determine whether a discharge causes, has a reasonablepotential to cause, or contributes to an excursion above a water qualitycriterion, and thus requires a water quality-based effluent limit, thepermitting authority must use reliable and consistent procedures. Althoughthe procedures can vary considerably from one state to another, most suchprocedures account for any dilution of the effluent in the receiving water,after considering mixing zones if applicable, any contributions of thepollutant from upstream point and nonpoint sources, the variability ofthe pollutant in the effluent, and, when evaluating whole effluent toxicity,the sensitivity of the test species in a toxicity test. Some commentersobjected to the reference to mixing zones and requested that EPA prohibitmixing zones. EPA believes, however, that it is inappropriate to prohibitmixing zones in this regulation. The use of mixing zones raises issuesthat are more appropriately addressed in the state water quality standardsadoption process. Therefore, EPA is not deleting the reference to mixingzones in paragraph (d)(1)(ii).Paragraph (d)(1)(ii) requires the permitting authority to consider variabilitybecause limited data on the concentration of a pollutant in an effluentresult in a large uncertainty when determining whether a discharge causesor has the reasonable potential to cause an excursion above a water qualitycriterion. Unless effluent variability is adequately considered, the permittingauthority may make erroneous decisions concerning whether to develop permitlimitations for a pollutant. One commenter suggested that the regulationshould establish a national applicable maximum variability factor. EPAhas procedures for accounting for variability in the Technical SupportDocument which may be applied to specific sites. However, EPA is not settinga national standard for variability because there is an element of judgmentin making such determinations that is best made by state or regional regulatoryauthorities. Factors such as the appropriate level of confidence and theadequacy of available data enter into these decisions, and many stateshave their own procedures for accounting for variability. EPA thereforebelieves it is more appropriate for each regulatory authority to evaluatevariability when determining whether an excursion above a water qualitycriterion can occur.Paragraph (d)(1)(ii) requires the permitting authority to account for speciessensitivity when using toxicity tests. Toxicity testing must account forspecies sensitivity because different test species exhibit different sensitivitiesto the same effluent.Subparagraph (ii) addresses discharges that have ``the reasonable potentialto cause'' excursions above water quality criteria. Because the concentrationof a pollutant in an effluent and in the receiving water can vary considerably,it is necessary to address discharges that have the reasonable potentialto violate water quality criteria. EPA requires water quality-based effluentlimits for these discharges in order to ensure compliance with section301(b)(1)(C) which requires NPDES permits to achieve applicable water qualitystandards.Some commenters said that the phrase ``reasonable potential to cause''was too vague and could apply to permittees that are not actually exceedinga water quality criterion. EPA does not believe that it is appropriateto be more specific because a permitting authority has a significant amountof flexibility in determining whether a particular discharge has a reasonablepotential to cause an excursion above a water quality criterion, takingthe factors in subparagraph (ii) into account. The composition and concentrationof toxicants in an effluent can vary widely. The flow rates of a dischargecan also show significant variability. Some effluents may prevent a waterquality standard from being maintained even though individual measurementsdo not show an actual excursion above the water quality criterion. Withouteffluent limitations on those discharges, there is a reasonable potentialthat the water quality criteria would be exceeded at some time. Effluentlimitations must attain and maintain water quality standards in order tobe consistent with the requirements of the Clean Water Act. Some commenterssuggested that all discharges would be required to have limits under thislanguage. EPA does not expect that this will be the case. However, EPAexpects that with few exceptions, all major POTWs and major industrialdischarges will need to be evaluated to determine whether they have a reasonablepotential to cause excursions. Before requiring a water quality-based effluentlimit, the permitting authority must have a basis for finding that dischargeshave the reasonable potential to cause excursions above water quality criteria.When EPA is the permitting authority, the Technical Support Document willnormally provide the basis for such a finding.Some commenters said the language ``causes or has the reasonable potentialto cause'' used in the proposed regulations implies that a single pointsource discharge must be responsible for the entire pollutant loading thatexceeds the water quality criterion. EPA did not intend this, and is persuadedthat this point needs clarification. EPA intended for the proposed regulationsto apply to any point source that is discharging a pollutant at a levelthat is exceeding or may exceed a waste load allocation for that discharge.This approach is consistent with EPA's existing regulation and policiesfor establishing water quality-based effluent limits. The process for identifyingwater quality-limited segments requiring total maximum daily loads (TMDLs)and wasteload allocations (WLAs) is set forth in EPA's regulations at 40CFR 130.7. This regulation establishes procedures for identifying and controllingmultiple discharges to the same receiving water in order to attain andmaintain applicable water quality standards. Under this approach, dischargeswhich contribute to the TMDL for a segment are apportioned a WLA whichserves as the basis for effluent limitations for the pollutant or pollutantof concern. To clarify this approach in today's regulations, EPA is addingthe phrase ``or contributes to'' to paragraphs (d)(1) (i) through (vi).This clarification makes no substantive change to today's regulations,but merely clarifies that today's amendments to paragraph (d)(1) are consistentwith EPA's existing approach for establishing water quality-based effluentlimits.Some commenters questioned how paragraph (ii) relates to the other paragraphsadded to andSection; 122.44(d)(1). The requirements of paragraphs (iii),(iv), (v) or (vi) apply after the permitting authority has determined thatwater quality-based effluent limits are necessary under paragraph (ii).Paragraph (ii) provides several principles that the permitting authoritymust follow when determining whether a pollutant or a pollutant parameteris exceeding a water quality criterion. If the permitting authority, afterapplying the principles in paragraph (ii), determines that a pollutantor a pollutant parameter is exceeding or is expected to exceed a waterquality criterion, then the permitting authority uses one or more of paragraphs(iii), (iv), (v) or (vi) to determine the appropriate controls for thepollutant or pollutant parameter. Subparagraph (ii) should assist the permittingauthority in determining whether it is necessary, under Federal regulations,to establish limits for a pollutant.The next two paragraphs that EPA is adding to andSection; 122.44(d) are paragraphs(d)(1)(iii) and (d)(1)(iv). EPA originally proposed these two paragraph'sas a single paragraph in (d)(1)(ii). The single paragraph addressed bothchemical-specific limits and whole effluent toxicity limits and many commenterswere confused about the meaning of the proposed paragraph. Therefore, forthe purposes of clarification, EPA divided the one paragraph into two paragraphs.Paragraph (d)(1)(iii) addresses only chemical-specific limits and paragraph(d)(1)(iv) addresses only whole effluent toxicity limits.Paragraph (d)(1)(iii) requires an NPDES permit to include an effluent limiton an individual pollutant when the permitting authority determines thatthe discharge of that pollutant is causing, is expected to cause, or contributesto, an excursion above a numeric water quality criterion for that pollutant.This paragraph applies where the state has adopted a numeric water qualitystandard for the pollutant of concern. Some commenters objected to thelanguage in this paragraph because they claimed the paragraph could potentiallyrequire effluent limits for a large number of pollutants in an effluent.EPA believes however that paragraph (d)(iii) will not result in any unnecessaryeffluent limits in NPDES permits because the permitting authority mustsatisfy the procedures in paragraph (ii) before establishing limits underparagraph (d)(1) (iii), (iv), (v), or (vi). Paragraph (ii) requires thepermitting authority to follow several fundamental principles when determiningthe need for an effluent limit. Furthermore, the permitting authority musthave a basis for determining that a discharge will cause or has the reasonablepotential to cause an excursion above the numeric water quality criterionfor that pollutant. (Where EPA is the permitting authority, use of theprocedures outlined in the Technical Support Document will normally providesuch a basis.) Paragraph (iii) does not require limits for every pollutantbut only for those pollutants which the permitting authority determinesmust be limited after applying the procedures described in paragraph (ii).Paragraph (d)(1)(iv) requires an NPDES permit to include a limit on wholeeffluent toxicity when the permitting authority determines that the effluentis causing or is expected to cause an excursion above a state numeric criterionfor whole effluent toxicity, where the state has promulgated a numericwater quality criterion for whole effluent toxicity. (Note, where a statehas not adopted a numeric water quality criterion for whole effluent toxicity,paragraph (d)(1)(v) may require whole effluent toxicity limits.) The commentson this language focused on EPA's legal authority to regulate whole effluenttoxicity, and on the scientific basis for toxicity testing. EPA addressesthese comments in the discussion of paragraph (d)(1)(v) later in this section.EPA is not persuaded by the comments challenging the language in paragraphs(d)(1)(iii) and (d)(1)(iv), and is therefore making no substantive changesto the proposed regulations.The next amendment to andSection; 122.44(d)(1) is subparagraph (v) (originallyproposed as subparagraph (iii)). This regulation requires the permittingauthority to establish permit limits on whole effluent toxicity when thedischarger causes or has the reasonable potential to cause an excursionabove a state's narrative water quality criterion.Subparagraph (v) allows the permitting authority to choose not to developwhole effluent toxicity limits where the permitting authority can demonstratethat chemical-specific limits will attain and maintain applicable waterquality criteria, including narrative water quality criteria. One methodfor making this demonstration would be to use toxicity testing to showthat the effluent has no acute or chronic toxic effects on aquatic lifein the receiving water. Some commenters said the exemption from whole effluenttoxicity limits provided in this paragraph is impractical because the costsof making the demonstration are prohibitive. EPA is not convinced thatthe costs of showing that chemical-specific limits attain and maintainappropriate water quality standards would be excessive. Over the life ofthe permit, the costs of the initial demonstrations could be substantiallyless than the costs of compliance monitoring associated with both typesof limits. The most straightforward method of making this demonstrationwill usually consist of toxicity testing in conjunction with chemical specifictesting for the chemicals which are limited in the permit. Costs of toxicitytests typically range from a few hundred dollars for simple screening teststo as much as one or two thousand dollars per month for monthly chronictoxicity analyses. While EPA recognizes that this approach will not alwaysbe the easiest and least expensive way to ensure that the narrative criteriaare met, EPA believes the option should remain available for those caseswhere the exemption from whole effluent toxicity limits is a viable andcost-effective option.The exception described in paragraph (d)(1)(v) is not available under paragraph(d)(1)(iv) because paragraph (d)(1)(iv) relies on numeric criteria forlimits on whole effluent toxicity, whereas paragraph (d)(1)(v) relies onnarrative criteria. Paragraph (d)(1)(iv) describes a situation where thestate has adopted a numeric criterion for whole effluent toxicity whichreflects the maximum degree of toxicity determined to be acceptable inthe state's surface waters. Narrative criteria for whole effluent toxicitydo not necessarily reflect an affirmative determination by the state toestablish a numeric criterion for whole effluent toxicity. The exceptionin paragraph (d)(1)(v), if used under paragraph (d)(1)(iv), could frustratethe state's efforts to establish effluent limits on whole effluent toxicityand implement its surface water toxics control program.Many commenters objected to whole effluent toxicity limits on the groundthat the scientific basis for toxicity testing is not sufficiently developed.These commenters also suggested that EPA should not use toxicity testsuntil EPA has published toxicity testing procedures pursuant to section304(h) of the CWA. EPA disagrees. EPA has shown, through testing protocols,site-specific studies, and guidance manuals, that toxicity testing is reliableand has a sound scientific basis. In 1984 EPA concluded that ``* * * toxicitytesting is sufficiently refined to be used in setting effluent limitations* * *,'' 49 FR 38009 (1984). EPA's studies since 1984 reinforce this conclusion.EPA has published a number of toxicity testing protocols that describereliable and reproducible toxicity tests. <T3>See </T3>for example: <T3>Short Term Methods for Estimating the Chronic Toxicity of Effluentsand Receiving Waters to Freshwater Organisms, </T3>EPA/600/4-89/001, SecondEdition, February 1989; <T3>Methods for Measuring the Acute Toxicity of Effluents to Freshwaterand Marine Organisms, </T3>Third Edition, EPA/600/4-85/013, March 1985;and <T3>Short-Term Methods for Estimating the Chronic Toxicity of Effluentsand Receiving Waters to Marine and Estuarine Organisms, EPA 600/4-87/028,May 1988.</T3>EPA's <T3>Technical Support Document for Water Quality-Based Toxics Control </T3>(TSD)gives detailed technical guidance for each phase of water quality-basedtoxics control. The TSD describes the technical basis for establishinglimits on whole effluent toxicity, and describes the methods for usingtoxicity testing in the permitting process. The TSD also cites severalstudies which show that toxicity testing methods, where properly followed,exhibit an acceptable range of variability.It is not necessary for EPA to publish toxicity testing guidelines pursuantto section 304(h) of the CWA before using biomonitoring and whole effluenttoxicity limits in NPDES permits. EPA has published toxicity testing protocolsthat can be used in NPDES permits. The absence of guidelines under section304(h) does not affect EPA's authority to use toxicity testing, nor doesit affect the reliability of EPA's toxicity testing protocols. EPA's positionon this issue is stated in the preamble to EPA's final NPDES regulations,49 FR 38010 (1984) and is reiterated here: permitting authorities mustuse their judgment in determining which toxicity testing methods are appropriatefor the NPDES permit. (Note that there are other toxicity testing methodologiesavailable. EPA has determined that EPA's methods are protective of aquaticlife. If a state wishes to use other methods, those methods must be scientificallydefensible and protective of aquatic life. EPA expects that such methodswould always be comparable to the procedures in EPA's methodologies andwould use test species of equivalent sensitivity.) Until EPA publishesguidelines under section 304(h), the premitting authority must specifyin the permit which analytical methodology must be used. Some commenters also questioned whether toxicity testing can be used topredict biological impact to receiving waters. To address this issue EPAhas conducted the ``Complex Effluent Toxicity Testing Program.'' The programhas produced eight site-specific studies which show that where exposureis adequately assessed, effluent toxicity correlates directly to in-streamimpact. The studies are: <T3>Validity of Effluent and Ambient Toxicity Tests for Predicting BiologicalImpact: </T3>Scippo Creek, Circleville, Ohio, EPA/600/3-85/044; OttawaRiver, Lima, Ohio, EPA/600/3-84/080; Five Mile Creek, Birmingham, Alabama,EPA/600/8-85/015; Skeleton Creek, Enid, Oklahoma, EPA/600/8-86/002; NaugatuckRiver, Waterbury, Connecticut, EPA/600/8-86/005; Back River, BaltimoreHarbor, Maryland, EPA/600/8-86/001; Ohio River, Near Wheeling, West Virginia,EPA/600/3-85/071; Kanawha River, Charleston, West Virginia, EPA/600/3-86/006.These studies are available from the Center for Environmental ResearchInformation, 26 West St. Clair Street, Cincinnati, Ohio 45268. Commenters also suggested that EPA does not have the legal authority torequire effluent limits on whole effluent toxicity. The commenters arguethat the state narrative water quality criterion ``no toxics in toxic amounts''cannot be used as a basis for requiring whole effluent toxicity limits.EPA disagrees. State narrative water quality criteria must be attainedand maintained in the same way as all water quality criteria. Narrativewater quality criteria have the same force of law as other water qualitycriteria, and NPDES permits must contain effluent limits necessary to attainand maintain all applicable water quality criteria, including narrativecriteria. The Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit recently upheldEPA's toxicity limits regulation, 40 CFR 125.3(c)(4), in <T3>Natural Resources Defense Council </T3>v. <T3>Environmental Protection Agency, </T3>859 F.2d 156 (D.C. Cir. 1988).Section 125.3(c)(4) provides that permit writers may express technology-basedor water quality-based limits in terms of toxicity as long as the limitsreflect the appropriate requirements of the CWA. The court concluded thatalthough toxicity appears to be an attribute of pollutants rather thana pollutant itself, the CWA authorizes the use of toxicity as a measureto regulate effluents. The court's affirmation of the use of whole effluenttoxicity limits further supports EPA's authority to require whole effluenttoxicity limits and to promulgate today's regulations. Finally, section 301(b)(1)(C) requires NPDES permits to contain any effluentlimitations necessary to meet all applicable water quality standards. Apermit would be inconsistent with section 301(b)(1)(C) if the permit didnot contain effluent limits necessary to attain and maintain both narrativeand numeric water quality criteria. For these reasons, EPA believes itsauthority to regulate discharges using whole effluent toxicity limits iswell established. Some commenters said EPA should use whole effluent toxicity testing onlyas a trigger for further investigation into the cause of the toxicity,and should not use whole effluent toxicity as an enforceable effluent limit.EPA cannot incorporate these suggestions. EPA requires whole effluent toxicitylimits where necessary to meet water quality standards. EPA does not believethat a whole effluent toxicity trigger alone is fully effective becauseit does not, by itself, restrict the quantity, rate, or concentration ofpollutants in an effluent. Whole effluent toxicity limitations are enforceablein the same way as any other effluent limitation in an NPDES permit. Section309 of the CWA provides that any single violation of an effluent limitationcan be subject to an enforcement action, and section 309 applies to wholeeffluent toxicity limits in the same way as any other effluent limitation.Several commenters asked if state narrative water quality criteria, thatare used as the basis for establishing effluent limits under paragraphs(d)(1)(v) and (vi), apply to all waters regardless of their designateduse. Narrative water quality criteria apply to all designated uses at allflows unless specified otherwise in a state's water quality standards.It is EPA's policy that no acutely toxic conditions may exist in any statewaters, regardless of designated use. State narrative water quality criteriaand interpretations of their narrative water quality criteria may be moreprotective than levels necessary to prevent acutely toxic conditions. Formore information, please refer to the Water Quality Standards Handbook,December 1983. State narrative water quality criteria provide the legal basis for establishingeffluent limits under paragraphs (d)(1)(v) and (d)(1)(vi) of today's regulations.There is flexibility in the state's interpretation of its narrative waterquality criteria. When a state adopts a narrative water quality criteria,EPA's regulations at 40 CFR 131.11(a)(2) require the state to ``provideinformation identifying the method by which the state intends to regulatepoint source discharges of toxic pollutants on water quality limited segmentsbased on such narrative criteria.'' When interpreting a state's narrativewater quality criteria, the premitting authority may use a proposed numericcriterion for the pollutant of concern, an explicit state policy, or aproposed or final state regulation interpreting its narrative criteriaprovided the interpretation will fully protect the designated use. In theabsence of an explicit state policy or regulation that fully protects thedesignated use, the permitting authority will use the procedures summarizedin paragraphs (d)(1)(ii) and (d)(1)(vii) of today's regulations for applyinga state's narrative water quality criteria. (Note that states may evaluatethe designated use of a waterbody by performing a use attainability analysispursuant to 40 CFR Part 131, and depending on the results of the use attainabilityanalysis may, after providing for public notice and an opportunity to comment,upgrade or downgrade the designated use of the waterbody.)   Subparagraph (vi), (originally proposed as subparagraph (iv)), addressesthe situation in which a state has not adopted a numeric water qualitycriterion for a toxic, conventional, or nonconventional pollutant thatis present in an effluent at a concentration that causes, has the reasonablepotential to cause, or contributes to an excursion above an applicablenarrative water quality criterion. In this situation the permitting authoritydoes not have a numeric criterion to use for deriving a water quality-basedeffluent limit. EPA emphasizes that paragraph (d)(1)(vi) is not used toestablish effluent limits on a pollutant if the state has adopted a numericwater quality criterion for that pollutant.Several commenters said the phrase ``* * * for a specific chemical pollutantthat is known to adversely affect or threaten human health or aquatic life* * *'' in proposed paragraph (vi) could have been read to require an effluentlimit for every priority pollutant, even if the pollutant is not presentin the effluent. Other commenters said this language should apply to dischargesthat are ``known or suspected'' to adversely affect aquatic life or humanhealth. EPA agrees that these points needed clarification. As a resultof these comments, EPA amended the introductory language of paragraph (vi)to clarify that water quality-based effluent limits are required only forpollutants that are ``* * * present in an effluent at a concentration thatcauses, has the reasonable potential to cause, or contributes to an excursionabove a narrative criterion within an applicable state narrative waterquality standard.'' This language clarifies that water quality-based effluentlimits are required only for pollutants present in an effluent at concentrationsof concern to the permitting authority. EPA also added the words ``or hasreasonable potential'' to the introductory language in paragraph (vi).This language is consistent with the language in paragraphs (i) through(v). This language is necessary to assure that effluent limits attain andmaintain water quality standards, and the language is discussed more fullyunder the discussion of paragraph (ii). The new language also clarifiesthat an applicable state narrative water quality criterion provides thelegal basis for establishing effluent limits under this paragraph. Thisrevised language clarifies the scope and applicability of paragraph (d)(1)(vi).Paragraph (d)(1)(vi) describes three options available to the permittingauthority for using narrative criteria as the basis for establishing effluentlimits. Option A allows the permitting authority to establish water quality-basedeffluent limitations using a ``calculated numeric water quality criterion''which the permitting authority demonstrates will attain and maintain applicablewater quality standards. When using this approach, states may derive valuesdifferent from the values in the EPA's water quality criteria documentsto reflect site-specific factors, including predicted local human consumptionof aquatic foods, as well as the state's determination of an appropriaterisk level, and any more recent scientific data that may not be includedin EPA's criteria documents. Under this option the permitting authorityshould use all available scientific information on the effect of a pollutanton human health and aquatic life. Available information includes but isnot limited to, risk assessments, exposure data, and site-specific waterquality parameters. (The proposed regulations included only two optionsunder this paragraph. Today's final regulation includes a third option_``optionC,'' which is described later in this section of the preamble. Today'sfinal regulations also reverse the order of proposed options A and B. Proposedoption A appears in today's final regulation as option B, and proposedoption B appears as option A in the final regulation. The remainder ofthis discussion refers to the options as they appear in today's final regulation.)Option A received a mixed reaction from commenters. Some commenters objectedto option A because it requires a water quality-based effluent limit fora pollutant before a state adopts a numeric water quality criterion forthat pollutant. Other commenters supported option A because the optiongives the permitting authority flexibility in developing water quality-basedeffluent limits. Many of the commenters who oppose option A suggested thatoption A circumvented the state's role in developing water quality standards.EPA responds to this concern in the discussion of option B. It is worthnoting, however, that this should be a minor concern for option A becauseoption A does not necessarily rely on EPA's water quality criteria. OptionA allows the permitting authority to use any criteria that protect aquaticlife and human health. Thus option A gives the states maximum flexibilityin developing water quality-based effluent limits for pollutants for whichthe state has not adopted a water quality criterion.One commenter objected to option A because it appeared to be similar tostate ``translator mechanisms'' for developing water quality standardsunder section 303(c)(2)(B). Some states use a procedure or ``translatormechanism'' to derive site-specific numeric water quality criteria andto develop water quality-based effluent limits. EPA's guidance implementingsection 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA provides that the use of a translator mechanismcan be consistent with section 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA. (<T3>See </T3>EPA's Guidance for State Implementation of Water Quality Standardsfor section 303(c)(2)(B).) Translator mechanisms that are used to satisfysection 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA must be approved by EPA before the translatormechanism becomes part of the state's water quality standards. Such approvedtranslator mechanisms can be used to develop effluent limitations underparagraph (d)(1)(iii) of today's regulations, but may not be used to developeffluent limitations under paragraph (d)(1)(vi). Paragraph (d)(1)(vi) isused only in the absence of a state numeric water quality criterion (includinga criterion derived from an approved translator mechanism). The optionsin paragraph (d)(1)(vi) provide a regulatory basis for developing waterquality-based effluent limitations as an interim measure until a numericcriterion for the pollutant of concern is available. State policies orprocedures, even procedures which calculate derived criteria but are notapproved by EPA, may be used to develop effluent limits under option Aof paragraph (d)(1)(vi). However, if the state has adopted a policy orprocedure in its standards that is approved by EPA and results in a derivedor calculated numeric criteria, the permitting authority must develop effluentlimits according to paragraph (d)(1)(iii) and may not use paragraph (d)(1)(vi).The commenter also claimed that translator mechanisms do not provide adequateopportunity for public participation. When using a translator mechanismthe state must provide an opportunity for public participation in the developmentof derived numeric criteria. The permit development process also givesthe public an opportunity to comment on the effluent limitations developedfrom the criteria derived using a translator mechanism.Several commenters stated that option A should describe scientificallysound procedures that must be followed when deriving numeric criteria.EPA believes it is inappropriate for this regulation to provide detailedtechnical procedures for developing numeric criteria because option A isintended to provide flexibility to the states when developing water quality-basedeffluent limitations. EPA emphasizes however, that scientifically validprocedures must be used to develop criteria that protect aquatic life andhuman health. The regulation suggests the use of EPA's Water Quality StandardsHandbook, but other procedures may be used provided the resulting numericwater quality criteria attain and maintain all applicable water qualitystandards. Because there is more than one procedure that can be used todevelop water quality-based effluent limitations under option A, EPA ismaking no changes to this language in option A.EPA believes that option A offers a reasonable approach to developing waterquality-based effluent limits in the absence of state numeric water qualitystandards, and EPA is not persuaded by the objections to option A. Therefore,EPA is promulgating option A with only the minor changes discussed above.The second option in paragraph (d)(1)(vi), (option B), allows the permittingauthority to establish effluent limits using EPA's Water Quality Criteriaguidance documents, if EPA has published a criteria document for the pollutantpursuant to section 304(a) of the CWA. (EPA criteria documents providea comprehensive summary of available data on the effects of a pollutant,and include maximum ambient concentrations that protect aquatic life andhuman health.) In the absence of a state numeric criterion for a pollutant,the permitting authority would use the appropriate EPA Water Quality Criteriadocument to calculate effluent limits for the pollutant in order to complywith applicable state narrative water quality criteria (<T3>e.g.</T3> ``no toxics in toxic amounts'').Many commenters objected to option B because they claimed that EPA doesnot have the legal authority to require the use of EPA's water qualitycriteria in developing effluent limitations. EPA reiterates that section301(b)(1)(C) requires that NPDES permits contain effluent limits that achievenarrative water quality criteria. This obligation applies regardless ofwhether or not a state has adopted a numeric water quality criterion fora pollutant of concern. EPA's water quality criteria should not be usedas a substitute for state water quality standards, but rather, option Bmay be used as one of three options to interpret state narrative waterquality criteria until the state adopts a numeric water quality criterionfor the pollutant. Further, EPA is not requiring states to use EPA's waterquality criteria. EPA is offering the water quality criteria as one ofthree options available to the state for interpreting and applying narrativewater quality criteria. EPA's water quality criteria provide one reasonableapproach for interpreting state narrative water quality criteria becauseEPA's criteria account for the effects of a pollutant on aquatic life andhuman health.Many commenters also suggested that option B circumvents the state's traditionalrole in establishing water quality standards. The commenters argue thatsection 303(c) of the CWA reserves for the states the sole authority toestablish water quality standards, and that option B would somehow preventa state from exercising its authority under section 303(c). EPA disagreesthat the use of option B in implementing the narrative criterion wouldprevent a state from adopting numeric water quality criteria. To the contrary,section 303(c)(2)(B) requires states to adopt water quality standards forcertain toxic pollutants as soon as possible. States must adopt standardsaccording to the provisions of section 303(c) and when the water qualitystandards are adopted, the NPDES permits must contain effluent limits necessaryto meet each standard. Option B applies only in the absence of state numericwater quality criteria. If a state has a numeric water quality criterionfor the pollutant of concern, then paragraph (vi) does not apply. OptionB is not intended to substitute EPA's water quality criteria for statewater quality standards. Option B simply provides a mechanism for implementingnarrative water quality criteria. Although states are required to adoptall necessary water quality standards under section 303, some states havenot yet done so. Thus EPA is promulgating paragraph (vi) as an interimmeasure to control a pollutant of concern until the state promulgates awater quality criterion for the pollutant. However, EPA's legal obligationto ensure that NPDES permits meet all applicable water quality standards,including narrative criteria, cannot be set aside while a state developswater quality standards. This legal obligation applies to more than stateadopted water quality standards. Section 301(b)(1)(C) requires that NPDESpermits achieve ``any more stringent limitation, including those necessaryto meet water quality standards, treatment standards, or schedule of compliance,established pursuant to any state law or regulations (under authority preservedby section 510) or any other Federal law'' including international treatiesor agreements that have force as domestic law.Some commenters suggested that EPA must incorporate the criteria documentsby reference in order to use them in option B. The Administrative ProceduresAct, 5 U.S.C. 552(a)(1) and 552(a)(1), requires agencies to publish inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4> or incorporate by reference, with the approvalof the Director of the Federal Register, all ``substantive rules * * *''Although NPDES permits must be developed in accordance with today's regulations,water quality criteria documents do not ``impose mandatory obligationsupon members of the public and permit issuance authorities * * *'' <T3>See Appalachian Power Co. </T3>v. <T3>Train </T3>566 F.2d 451, 455 (4th Cir. 1977). The regulations provideother options that a state may use to determine the appropriate interpretationof its narrative water quality criteria.The preamble to the proposed regulations solicited comment on a third optionfor subparagraph (vi). The third option proposed to allow the establishmentof effluent limits on pollutants other than toxicants of concern such asan indicator parameter. An indicator parameter could be a conventionalpollutant like total suspended solids (TSS), the control of which may betied to a concomitant decrease in metals concentration. Another exampleof an indicator parameter is total toxic organics (TTO). Effluent limitationson TTO can be used to control the organic pollutants in an effluent, andare useful where an effluent contains many organic compounds. In such acase, the permitting authority must demonstrate that compliance with alimitation on the indicator parameter or some other effluent limit wouldensure the control of the toxicant of concern to a level that will attainand maintain applicable state narrative water quality criteria, and willprotect aquatic life and human health. EPA received mixed comments on thisoption. Some commenters liked the flexibility provided by the option, whereasother commenters pointed out the technical problems of demonstrating thatcontrols on one pollutant also control other pollutants.EPA's existing regulations allow the permitting authority to use indicatorparameters for technology-based controls (see 40 CFR 125.3(c)(4), 125.3(h),and 122.44(e), and certain effluent limitation guidelines.) In the caseof effluent limitations guidelines, EPA has data and other informationshowing that controls on one pollutant sometimes control one or more otherpollutants. Similar data are often not available when developing waterquality-based effluent limitations and therefore, the regulation describingthis option requires a justification for using the indicator parameterin the permit. There may be cases where effluent limits on an indicatorparameter are sufficient to attain and maintain applicable water qualitystandards for pollutants of concern and EPA does not wish to foreclosethis option for water quality-based controls. Therefore EPA is includinga third option in paragraph (vi) that allows the permitting authority touse indicator parameters under limited circumstances.Like options A and B, option C is used only where a state has not adopteda water quality criterion for a pollutant for which the permitting authorityhas data showing that the pollutant is present in an effluent at a concentrationthat causes, has the reasonable potential to cause, or contributes to anexcursion above an applicable state narrative water quality criterion.In order to use option C the permitting authority must satisfy four conditions.First, the permit must identify which pollutant is intended to be controlledby the indicator parameter. This condition is similar to the requirementin 40 CFR 125.3(h) describing the use of indicator parameters for technology-basedcontrols. Second, the fact sheet of the NPDES permit must include a findingthat the effluent limit for the indicator parameter will attain and maintainapplicable water quality standards. This condition is also similar to therequirements in 40 CFR 125.3(h), but is modified to address water quality-basedeffluent limits. Third, the permit must require all monitoring necessaryto show that the limits on the indicator parameter continue to attain andmaintain applicable water quality standards. This condition of option Cis necessary to ensure that the controls on the indicator parameter aresufficient to attain and maintain applicable water quality standards. Fourth,the permit must contain a reopener clause allowing the permitting authorityto modify or revoke and reissue the permit if the limits on the indicatorparameter no longer attain and maintain applicable water quality standards.This requirement clarifies that a permit may be reopened if the controlson the indicator parameter are insufficient. The type and frequency ofmonitoring necessary under condition three above would be determined bythe permitting authority and would be based on case-specific factors. Ingeneral, EPA expects that this monitoring would include analysis of theeffluent for the indicator parameter and the pollutant of concern at afrequency sufficient to verify the correlation for the various operatingconditions of the discharger. EPA recognizes that it may be difficult toshow a correlation between controls on the indicator parameter and controlson the pollutants of concern. EPA recognizes that in most cases the dataprobably will not be available to show such a correlation. However, wheresuch data are available EPA believes this option should be available tothe permitting authority.Today's regulations do not allow the permitting authority to use indicatorparameters under paragraphs (d)(1) (iii) and (iv). Indicator parametersmay not be used to develop effluent limitations under these paragraphsbecause, under these paragraphs, the state has promulgated a numeric criterionfor the pollutant of concern. Such a numeric criterion represents a state'saffirmative decision with respect to the maximum allowable ambient concentrationfor the pollutant. If paragraphs (d)(1) (iii) and (iv) provided for theuse of indicator parameters, such provisions could frustrate the state'sefforts to promulgate and implement water quality standards. EPA is limitingthe use of indicator parameters to paragraph (d)(1)(vi) because this paragraphis intended as an interim measure employed in the absence of a state numericcriterion for the pollutant of concern, and because EPA seeks to allowthe states flexibility to interpret their narrative water quality criteria.There are several additional noteworthy points about developing effluentlimitations under option C. In some cases, protecting sensitive test speciesfrom observed chronic exposure can protect against human health impactsbecause EPA's experience with toxicants has shown that values necessaryto protect aquatic life are often more stringent than values necessaryto protect human health. Thus, in many cases the controls necessary toavoid chronic aquatic effects may also protect against human exposure.However, the regulatory authorities should be cautious if a limit on wholeeffluent toxicity is used as an indicator parameter. Whole effluent toxicitylimits may not necessarily account for carcinogenic compounds or highlybioaccumulative compounds, differences in the bioavailability of a pollutantonce discharged to the receiving water, and the toxic effects which canoccur from persistent chemicals that accumulate in sediments.The final point about paragraph (vi) is that in the majority of cases whereparagraph (vi) applies waste load allocations and total maximum daily loadswill not be available for the pollutant of concern. Nonetheless, any effluentlimit derived under paragraph (vi) must satisfy the requirements of paragraph(vii). Paragraph (vii) requires that all water quality-based effluent limitationscomply with ``appropriate water quality standards,'' and be consistentwith ``available'' waste load allocations. Thus for the purposes of complyingwith paragraph (vii), where a wasteload allocation is unavailable, effluentlimits derived under paragraph (vi) must comply with narrative water qualitycriteria and other applicable water quality standards.Several commenters asked if it was necessary to show in-stream impact,or to show adverse effects on human health before invoking paragraph (vi)as a basis for establishing water quality-based limits on a pollutant ofconcern. It is not necessary to show adverse effects on aquatic life orhuman health to invoke this paragraph. The CWA does not require such ademonstration and it is EPA's position that it is not necessary to demonstratesuch effects before establishing limits on a pollutant of concern.Several commenters suggested that option A will create a large resourceburden for the states by requiring them to develop numeric criteria. EPAunderstands that a significant effort is involved in deriving a numericcriterion as the basis for water quality-based effluent limits under optionA. However, where a state chooses this option, EPA sees no alternativebut to derive a numeric criterion that protects aquatic life and humanhealth. Option A gives the state flexibility in developing numeric criteria,and if the state believes that option A involves too many resources thestate is free to use the other, less resource intensive options describedin this paragraph.Several commenters were concerned that the anti-backsliding provisionsof section 402(o) of the CWA would apply to the effluent limitations developedunder section 304(1). Section 402(o) does not necessarily prevent EPA orthe states from reissuing NPDES permits with less stringent effluent limitationsthan the limits in the prior permit. The amendments establish a processand conditions for determining when less stringent limits are appropriate.These provisions apply to both technology-based and water quality-basedeffluent limitations. For water quality-based effluent limitations, theapplicability of section 402(o) depends on whether the receiving watersare attaining and maintaining applicable water quality standards at thetime of permit renewal. While there may be cases where section 402(o) prohibitsless stringent effluent limitations, such a result can only be determinedon a case-by-case basis.It is EPA's intent that the three options in subparagraph (vi) will allowthe permitting authority to set effluent limits to control discharges (inthe absence of state numerical water quality criteria for all pollutantsof concern) that interfere with attaining and maintaining designated uses,while at the same time, giving the permitting authority sufficient flexibilityto account for site-specific impacts on aquatic life or human health.A number of commenters indicated some confusion over the applicabilityof subparagraphs (iii), (iv), (v), and (vi), and some confusion over therelationship between these provisions. Paragraph (iii) is intended to applywhen the permitting authority has data on a conventional, nonconventional,or toxic pollutant, indicating that a point source is causing, is expectedto cause, or contributes to an excursion above a state numeric water qualitycriterion for that pollutant. In contrast to paragraph (iii), paragraph(iv) requires only whole effluent toxicity limits, and applies when thepermitting authority has either toxicity data, pollutant-specific data,or other data, <T3>and </T3>this data shows that an effluent causes, is expected to cause,or contributes to an excursion above a numeric water quality criterionfor toxicity. Paragraphs (iii) and (iv) do not operate to require bothwhole effluent toxicity limits and chemical-specific limits in every permit,as some commenters suggested. Although paragraph (iii) requires pollutant-specificeffluent limits when the permitting authority has sufficient data for thatpollutant, paragraphs (iii) and (iv) are consistent with EPA's toxics controlstrategy which recommends the appropriate combination of whole effluenttoxicity and pollutant-specific controls necessary to attain and maintainall applicable water quality standards. EPA also emphasizes that the controlsdescribed in paragraphs (iii), (iv), (v), and (vi) are necessary only afterthe permitting authority has determined, using the principles in paragraph(ii), that water quality-based effluent limits are necessary for a discharge.Paragraph (v) requires only whole effluent toxicity limits, and is usedwhen the permitting authority relies on a narrative water quality criterion.Unlike paragraph (iv), paragraph (v) applies when the state has not adopteda numeric water quality criterion for whole effluent toxicity.Paragraph (vi) applies when the permitting authority has data on a conventional,nonconventional, or toxic pollutant, indicating that a point source isdischarging the pollutant at a concentration that is causing, is expectedto cause, or contributes to an excursion above an applicable narrativecriterion for water quality, <T3>and </T3>the state has not adopted a numeric water quality criterionfor the pollutant. Paragraph (vi) requires only effluent limits for individualpollutants (except in those cases where limits on whole effluent toxicitycan be used as an indicator parameter). If the permitting authority usesparagraph (vi) to require a pollutant-specific effluent limit, and thepermitting authority also has toxicity data indicating a toxicity problem,the permitting authority would use paragraph (iv) or paragraph (v), whicheverapplies, to require whole effluent toxicity limits. EPA hopes this discussionof these paragraphs clarifies the applicability of these regulations.Several commenters objected to the references in option A to EPA's WaterQuality Standards Handbook and to EPA's water quality criteria documents.The commenters suggested that EPA must incorporate by reference these documentsinto today's regulation, and solicit public comment on the documents inorder to refer to them in the rulemaking. It is not necessary however,to incorporate these documents by reference as part of this rulemakingbecause option A refers to these documents only as suggested resource materialsthat may be used as one option in the regulations. The documents do notcontain enforceable requrements, and the use of these documents is notmandatory under the regulations. Therefore the documents do not need tobe incorporated by reference into these regulations.The final change to andSection; 122.44(d)(1) is subparagraph (vii). Thissubparagraph describes two requirements that the permitting authority mustuse to derive water quality-based effluent limits. The first requirementprovides that water quality-based effluent limits shall be derived fromwater quality standards. Under section 303(c) of the CWA, and Part 131of EPA's regulations, a state must adopt water quality standards, (includingan antidegradation policy) and submit the standards to EPA for review.Although Part 131 describes the process for adopting and reviewing waterquality standards, EPA's permitting regulations in Part 122 do not specifythat water quality-based effluent limits must be derived from water qualitystandards, (although this requirement is implied in andSection; 122.44).The language in paragraph (vii) clarifies this requirement of the NPDESpermitting regulations.The second requirement in subparagraph (vii) for deriving water quality-basedeffluent limits, is that the water quality-based effluent limits must beconsistent with wateload allocations (WLAs) developed and approved in accordancewith 40 CFR 130.7, if a WLA is available for the discharge. A wasteloadallocation is defined at 40 CFR 130.2 and reflects the portion of a receivingwater's loading capacity that is allocated to a point source. The requirementto use approved wasteload allocations for water quality-based permit limitsis implied in current andSection; 122.44(d) because paragraph (d) requireseffluent limits to meet water quality standards. Today's language clarifiesEPA's existing regulations by stating that when WLAs are available, theymust be used to translate water quality standards into NPDES permit limits.Although subparagraph (vii) requires the permitting authority to use awasteload allocation if one has been approved under Part 130, today's regulationsdo not allow the permitting authority to delay developing and issuing apermit if a wasteload allocation has not already been developed and approved.Deriving water quality-based effluent limits from water quality standardsis the only reliable method for developing water quality-based effluentlimits that protect aquatic life and human health. Pursuant to section303(c)of the CWA, the states adopt water quality standards, and then, undersection 303(d), develop total maximum daily loads (TMDLs), for water quality-limitedsegments, to attain and maintain the water quality standards. The TMDLsare used to derive a wasteload allocation for individual pollutants dischargedfrom a point source. This process results in effluent limits that protectaquatic life and human health because the limits are derived from waterquality standards.Subparagraph (vii) does not prescribe detailed procedures for developingwater quality-based effluent limits. Rather, the regulation prescribesminimum requirements for developing water quality-based effluent limits,and at the same time, gives the permitting authority the flexibility todetermine the appropriate procedures for developing water quality-basedeffluent limits.Comments on subparagraph (vii) were generally favorable. The comments supportedthe concept of deriving water quality-based effluent limits from waterquality criteria, and favor the language requiring water quality-basedeffluent limits to be consistent with a wasteload allocation, if a wasteloadallocation is available for the discharge. Therefore, because subparagraph(vii) describes two fundamental principles for deriving water quality-basedeffluent limits, and because the comments on this regulation were generallyfavorable, EPA is promulgating this regulation without change from theproposed regulation.<T3>d. Technology-Based Controls on Toxic Pollutants. </T3>The final changeto andSection; 122.44 is a modification to the title of paragraph (e). Thenew title reads ``Technology-Based Controls on Toxic Pollutants.'' Thistitle more accurately describes the scope of paragraph (e). Paragraph (e)has been used primarily as a basis for requiring technology-based controls.Although the proposed regulations suggested the title ``Toxic Pollutantsand Sources of Toxicity,'' a number of commenters suggested that the proposedchanges to paragraph (e) overlapped with the amendments to paragraph (d).EPA is persuaded by these comments, and is therefore clarifying in today'spreamble that paragraph (e) applies primarily to technology-based controls,whereas paragraph (d) applies whenever the permitting authority is developingwater quality-based controls.The proposed regulations included a new paragraph (e)(2), but EPA decidedit is more appropriate to place this language in paragraph (d)(1). Thenew language applies to water quality-based controls, not technology-basedcontrols, and the language provides an accurate statement of the controlsnecessary in an NPDES permit to attain and maintain water quality standards.The commenters also found the proposed change in paragraph (e)(3)(iii)to overlap with the amendments to paragraph (d). Therefore, EPA decidednot to include the proposal in today's final regulations. EPA proposedto add a reference to whole effluent toxicity in paragraph (e), but theproposed language clouded the distinction between paragraph (d) and paragraph(e). To maintain a clear distinction between the applicability of theseparagraphs, EPA decided to not carry the language proposed for paragraph(e)(3)(iii) forward into today's final regulations.Thus, the only change that today's rulemaking makes to paragraph (e) isto change the title of the paragraph to reflect more accurately the scopeof the paragraph.2. State NPDES Program Requirements. The proposed regulations includeda new paragraph for andSection; 123.63(a) to clarify EPA's authority to withdrawa state's NPDES program if state fails to develop an adequate program fordeveloping water quality-based effluent limits in NPDES permits. Today'sregulations include this language without change from the proposed regulation.The new language focuses on how well a state's NPDES permits protect waterquality. If other elements of a state's surface water toxics control programadversely affect the quality of NPDES permit limits, then EPA may includeother program elements in its evaluation of a state's NPDES program. Forexample, if a state fails to use consistent and defensible procedures fordeveloping water quality-based effluent limits, EPA would consider thisdeficency when evaluating a state's NPDES program.Several commenters asked for a detailed decision of the exact meaning ofthe phrase ``adequate regulatory program'' as it is used in today's regulations.EPA believes, however, that it is inappropriate to be too prescriptiveabout the requirements for state surface water toxics control programs.The states have flexibility in developing programs to address toxics, andtoday's regulations do not affect this flexibility. In its oversight ofstate programs, EPA has emphasized and will continue to emphasize the importanceof toxics control programs, and today's regulations reflect the prioritythat EPA believes is appropriate for these programs.EPA is adding this criteria to andSection; 123.63(a) because it is essentialfor all authorized states to operate effective toxics control programs.An adequate state regulatory program for developing water quality-basedeffluent limits in NPDES permits should be an integral part of each approvedstate's NPDES program.B. Identification of WatersSection III.A of this preamble discussed the rules for strengthening EPA'songoing surface water toxics control program. The remainder of this preamblediscusses the requirements of section 304(l) of the CWA and how EPA isincorporating these requirements into EPA's toxics control program. Thissection (III.B) discusses how EPA and the states will administer the listingrequirements of section 304(l).<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Description of the Four Lists</ITAG>The four lists required by section 304(l)(1), paragraphs (A)(i), (A)(ii),(B), and (C) are described below.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note. </T4>Both paragraphs (A)(i) and (B)(i) use the term ``toxic pollutants,''however, EPA is implementing the section 304(l)(1)(B) listing and controlrequirements by relying on the priority pollutants rather than the thousandsof pollutants potentially encompassed by the term ``toxic pollutants.''(See Section II.B of this preamble for further discussion.) Also, ammoniaand chlorine are not included within the terms ``toxic pollutants,'' ``andSection;307(a) toxic pollutants'' or ``priority pollutants'' for the purposes ofsection 304(l).</ITAG><T3>Paragraph (A)(i) of section 304(l)(1) </T3>requires a list of thosewaters in each state which, after application of technology-based effluentlimits, ``cannot reasonably be anticipated to attain or maintain waterquality standards for such waters reviewed, revised, or adopted in accordancewith section 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA,'' due to section 307(a) toxic pollutants.Section 303(c)(2)(B) refers to the adoption by the states of numeric criteriainto their water quality standards for section 307(a) toxic pollutants.Therefore, EPA interprets the (A)(i) list to include only those waterswhere water quality standards with numeric criteria adopted under section303(c)(2)(B) for priority pollutants are not achieved, or are not expectedto be achieved, due to either point or nonpoint sources of pollution, onor before February 4, 1989, after application BAT, pretreatment and newsources performance standards. These are final water quality criteria whichhave been reviewed, revised and adopted by the state and approved by EPA.<T3>Paragraph (A)(ii) of section 304(l)(1) </T3>requires a list of thosewaters within each state which, after the application of technology-basedeffluent limitations, ``cannot reasonably be anticipated to attain or maintainthat water quality which shall assure the protection of public health,public water supplies, agricultural and industrial uses, and the protectionand propagation of shellfish, fish and wildlife, and allow recreationalactivities in and on the water.'' EPA interprets this to mean that thestate must create a comprehensive list of waters that are impaired or areexpected to be impaired as of February 4, 1989 by point or nonpoint sourcedischarges of toxic, conventional, or nonconventional pollutants. Thislist should include all waters not meeting the goals of the CWA after theapplication of technology-based effluent limitations, regardless of whetheror not a state has adopted numeric criteria within their water qualitystandards. This includes all waters which are classified for uses thatdo not meet the ``fishable and swimmable'' goals of the Act.<T3>Paragraph (B) of section 304(l)(1) </T3>requires a list of those waterswithin each state for ``which the state does not expect the applicablestandard under andSection;303 of the CWA will be achieved after the requirementsof sections 301(b), 306, and 307(b) are met, due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources of any toxic pollutants listed pursuantto section 307(a)'' of the CWA. EPA interprets this list to include allwaters which can not achieve or are not expected to achieve, either thenumeric or narrative water quality criteria applicable to a priority pollutantdue entirely or substantially to discharges from point sources on or beforeFebruary 4, 1989 after application of BAT, pretreatment and new sourceperformance standards. Waters where impairment is due to discharges ofwhole effluent toxicity are included on the paragraph (B) list only whenthe toxicity is due in whole or in large part to one or more of the prioritypollutants. (Waters where whole effluent toxicity is observed, but is notattributable to a priority pollutant, are to be included on the paragraph(A)(ii) list.)For all the waters listed on the paragraph (B) list, the state must identifythe point sources discharging the priority pollutant(s) as described belowthe develop individual control strategies for each point source. (See sectionIII.C. of this preamble for more information on individual control strategies.)Interpretations of the terms ``applicable standard,'' and ``due entirelyor substantially to discharges from point sources,'' which appear in thestatutory language of section 304(l)(1)(B), are discussed in the next section(section III.B.2) of this preamble.<T3>Paragraph (C) of section 304(l)</T3> describes the fourth list requiredto be submitted by the states to EPA. It requires, for each of the segmentsincluded on the paragraph (B) list, ``a determination of the specific pointsources discharging any such toxic pollutant which is believed to be preventingor impairing such water quality and the amount of each such toxic pollutantdischarged by each such source.'' EPA interprets this paragraph to meanthat for each water on the paragraph (B) list, the state must list eachpoint source within its jurisdiction that is discharging the priority pollutant(s)to the water which is listed, and the amount of each priority pollutantdischarged by each such source. Individual control strategies (ICSs) areto be prepared for each point source discharger on the paragraph (C) list.Some commenters maintained that individual control strategies are requiredfor all three lists of waters to be developed under section 304(l), andthat EPA's interpretation that ICSs are only required for the paragraph(B) list of waters is contrary to Congressional intent. The statutory languageindicates that individual control strategies must be developed which willproduce a reduction of point source discharges of section 307(a) toxicpollutants in order to achieve applicable water quality standards withinthree years of establishment of the strategy. In order for such point sourcecontrols, in combination with ``existing nonpoint source controls,'' toeffectively achieve water quality standards, there is an implicit assumptionthat such waters are capable of achieving or making significant progresstoward achieving water quality standards primarily by controlling pointsources of section 307(a) toxic pollutants. Such a scenario correspondsto the paragraph (B) list of waters, and therefore support EPA's interpretationthat the ICS requirement applies only to the paragraph (B) list. However,like ICSs, permits for any point source discharges to waters on the paragraphs(A)(i) and (B) lists must still include effluent limits to attain and maintainwater quality standards for all parameters of concern including toxic pollutants,through the permits are not subject to the compliance dates of section304(l).Note that every state, as defined by EPA at 40 CFR 122.2, is required tosubmit lists of waters, sources and amounts whether or not the state isauthorized by EPA to administer the NPDES program. Some commenters asked EPA how to assess whether to list waters on the paragraph(B) list which have point sources which do not yet meet either existingpermit limits derived from technology-based standards under section 301(b), 306 and 307(b) of the CWA, or do not yet have such permit limits. EPArequires the state to list any water that was not meeting its applicablewater quality standards by February 4, 1989 on one or more of the listsof waters described above, as appropriate.The only exception to this requirement is provided when a state demonstratesthat enforceable permit limits derived from technology-based standardswill bring the water into compliance with applicable water quality standards.However, EPA expects that where compliance with technology-based limitscannot be expected within three years of the preparation of the list, therewill be too much uncertainty in the determination of whether the limitsare adequate to achieve water quality standards in order to demonstrateto EPA that the water should not be listed. If the existing permit limits are based on water quality standards andthose limits are not yet achieved as of February 4, 1989 due entirely orsubstantially to discharges from point sources, the water should be includedon the paragraph (B) list. These waters qualify for the paragraph (B) listeven if the permit has a compliance schedule to achieve water quality standardson or before June 4, 1992. In these cases it may not be necessary to modifythese existing limits or schedules in the permit to meet the compliancedeadlines of section 304(l), and the existing permit may qualify as anICS. However, the waters and point sources must be listed and the permitauthority must still review the existing permit, exercise its judgmentto decide if the existing water quality-based limits will meet the section304(l) compliance dates, and revise the limits if necessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Explanation of Terms Used in section 304(l)(1)(B) </ITAG>Paragraph (B) of section 304(l)(1) introduces two terms that EPA believesneed further interpretation and explanation to ensure consistency in implementingthis paragraph. These terms are ``applicable standard,'' and ``due entirelyor substantially to discharges from point sources.'' Paragraphs 130.10(d)(4) and (5) of today's amendments contain these interpretations. a. <T3>Applicable standard. </T3>For the purposes of listing waters underparagraph (B) of section 304(l)(1), in paragraph 130.10(d)(4) EPA interpretsthe ``applicable standard'' to mean numeric criteria promulgated withinstate water quality standards for priority pollutants. Where a state numericcriterion for a priority pollutant is not promulgated in state water qualitystandards, for the purposes of listing waters under section 304(l), ``applicablestandard'' means the state narrative water quality criteria to controltoxic pollutants (e.g. ``no toxics in toxic amounts''). These state narrativewater quality criteria can be interpreted, on a chemical-by-chemical basis,by applying a proposed state numeric criterion, or an explicit state policyor regulation for interpreting the narrative criterion, or an EPA waterquality criterion published in EPA's water quality criteria guidance documents,supplemented by other relevant information. Other relevant informationmay include, for example EPA's Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS)database (see EPA document EPA/600/8-86/032), local exposure assessments,and other site-specific information. Among these alternative interpretationsof narrative criteria, EPA will give substantial deference to a proposedstate numeric criterion, or an explicit state policy or regulation wherethe interpretation will fully protect the designated uses. In the absenceof any such acceptable state interpretations which protect the designateduses, an EPA national water quality criterion must be used for interpretingthe state's narrative water quality criteria, supplemented with other relevantinformation as described above. Many commenters objected to the proposal to use national water qualitycriteria to interpret the state's narrative water quality criteria forthe purposes of listing waters under section 304(l)(1)(B). To make it clearthat EPA's intent is not to undermine or usurp state authority to developwater quality standards, but to establish a minimum baseline for screeningwaters to be listed, EPA has added language to today's preamble and regulationthat encourages a state, whenever possible, to rely on its formally proposedor adopted interpretations, policies, criteria and risk levels as the applicablestandard for listing purposes under section 304(l). Only in the absenceof these is EPA requiring the use of EPA water quality criteria and specifyingthe risk level to be used. Furthermore, EPA allows the state to rely onadditional or more recent representative scientific data when availableto update the information in the EPA water quality criteria documents,such as EPA's Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS) documents. In the absence of formally proposed or adopted numeric criteria for allof the priority pollutants or explicit state policies which interpret thenarrative water quality criteria, EPA needs some criteria or definitionof impairment to identify waters for listing. If waters that are exceedingnarrative criteria are excluded from the paragraph (B) list, those statesthat have not yet set numeric water quality criteria for the priority pollutantswould effectively be exempted from the requirements of section 304(l)(1)(B),despite the possible presence of significant water quality problems. Thesection 304(l) statutory language mandates that states and EPA move forwardexpeditiously to achieve water quality goals and it does not provide relieffrom deadlines due to lack of numeric criteria within state water qualitystandards. One commenter suggested that EPA require each state to establishits own numeric criteria in water quality standards for the section 307(a)toxic pollutants as part of the section 304(l) list development process.The CWA does not provide time for delay in implementing section 304(l)requirements pending state action to establish their own numeric criteriain water quality standards. After identifying a water for listing on the section 304(l)(1)(B) listby using the EPA criteria, a state may then use other and more site-specificdata and criteria to establish appropriate permit limits in the individualcontrol strategies for the point sources on the water. This process isdescribed in andSection; 122.44(d)(1) of today's rule. EPA received comments arguing that EPA must incorporate its water qualitycriteria documents by reference in order to require states to list watersin accordance with these documents. The Administrative Procedures Act,5 U.S.C. 552(a)(1) and 522(a)(1), requires agencies to publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> or incorporate by reference with approval ofthe Director of the Federal Register, all ``substantive rules.'' EPA hasamended andSection; 130.10(d)(4) to allow states to list waters on the basisof their own interpretations of the state narrative criteria, and the useof EPA water quality criteria documents is clearly not mandatory. Therefore,EPA is not incorporating the criteria documents by reference in today'srule. (See the discussion of this issue in section III.A. above.) Several commenters asked if state narrative water quality criteria applyto all waters regardless of their designated use. Narrative water qualitycriteria apply to all designated uses at all flows unless specified otherwisein a state's water quality standards. It is EPA's policy that no acutelytoxic conditions may exist in any state waters, regardless of designateduse. A state's narrative water quality criteria and interpretations ofits narrative water quality criteria may be more protective than the levelsnecessary to prevent acutely toxic conditions. For more information, pleaserefer to EPA's Water Quality Standards Handbook, December, 1983.One commenter requested that the definition of applicable standard includethe water quality standards and limitations established under the GreatLakes Water Quality Agreement of 1978. EPA has not incorporated this commentinto today's final rule. Section 304(l)(1)(B) refers to the ``applicablestandard under section 303 of this Act.'' Section 303 establishes the processfor state adoption of water quality standards and, in those situationswhere EPA disapproves a state standard, it establishes the process forEPA promulgation of a water quality standard for such state. Provisionsof the Great Lakes Water Quality Agreement are not standards ``under section303'' of the Clean Water Act.<T3>b. Due Entirely or Substantially to Discharges From Point Sources.</T3>Paragraph 130.10(d)(5) describes two conditions that require a waterto be listed under paragraph (B) of section 304(l)(1) because the applicablewater quality standard is not expected to be met ``due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources.'' These two conditions are listed below.In making the determination of whether a water meets either of these conditions,a state should perform a water quality analysis using a design flow specifiedin state regulation or policy, or the critical design flow as establishedby EPA guidance or regulation (for example, EPA's Technical Guidance Manualfor Performing Wasteload Allocations_Book VI, Design Conditions_ChapterI Stream Design Flow for Steady State Modeling, September 1986 (EPA 440/4-87-004).)If a water meets either of the conditions below, after the applicationof the technology-based requirements of sections 301(b), 306, and 307(b),then it must appear on a state's section 304(l)(1)(B) list. (See discussionin section III.B.1 of this preamble on application of technology-basedrequirements for making listing decisions.)(a) Existing or additional water quality-based limits on one or more pointsources would result in the achievement of an applicable water qualitystandard for a priority pollutant or;(b) The discharge of a priority pollutant from one or more point sources,regardless of any nonpoint source contribution of the same pollutant, issufficient to cause, or is expected to cause, an excursion above the applicablewater quality standard for the priority pollutant.The proposed rulemaking contained three conditions. Many commenters objectedto one or more of them; some supported one or more of them. The Agencydecided to revise conditions (a) and (b) slightly and delete condition(c) in response to comments.Many commenters objected to the three conditions in the proposal becausethe conditions do not consider the proportion of point source contributionsto nonpoint source contributions and thereby could require controls onpoint sources which may be contributing relatively small amounts of thepollutant of concern. Some commenters suggested EPA designate a specificpercentage that the point source would have to contribute in order to belisted. EPA decided not to revise the conditions in response to these commentsbecasuse it is important whenever possible to bring waters into compliancewith water quality standards, and if additional controls on point sourceswill do so, then they should not be delayed or omitted due to contributionsfrom nonpoint sources. Furthermore, proportions are difficult to calculatebecause they vary widely. For example, rainfall events can change dramaticallythe proportion of point and nonpoint source contributions by contributingvery large but occasional and almost unpredictable loads from nonpointsources. However, to the extent that relative point and nonpoint sourcecontributions can be determined, a state may make appropriate and cost-effectiveadjustments to respective control requirements for nonpoint and point sourcesthrough the total maximum daily load and wasteload allocation processesestablished under 40 CFR 130.7.Many commenters objected to the proposed conditions on the basis that controlson point sources may not necessarily bring the water into compliance withthe water quality standard since the nonpoint source contribution alonecan cause excursions. In these cases, the commenters argued an NPDES permitwould not be able to be issued that meets EPA's definition of an individualcontrol strategy. The conditions were not revised or deleted in responseto these comments. In essence, these comments suggest that EPA should listwaters on the basis of whether or not the water quality standard can beachieved within the statutory framework of section 304(1), rather thanon the basis of the pollutant load to the stream from point sources. EPAbelieves that the Congressional purpose of controlling point sources whichare substantial contributors to a failure to meet water quality standards,would be best accomplished by focusing on the point source discharges toparticular waters. If EPA were to define ``due * * * substantially to dischargesfrom point sources'' to exclude waters where the water quality standardscannot be met by point source controls alone, then the discharges to someof the most polluted waters may not be controlled. Congress enacted a comprehensivescheme to address waters impaired by both point and nonpoint sources oftoxic pollutants. At the same time that it enacted section 304(l), Congresspassed section 319 to address nonpoint sources. When section 304(l)(1)(B)is read together with section 319, EPA believes that all waters not achievingwater quality standards for priority pollutants should be listed pursuantto at least one or sometimes both sections of the Act. To exclude a waterfrom the section 304(l)(1)(B) list because of nonpoint sources would leaveopen the possibility of a state excluding the same water from its section319 list because of point source contributions. The result of such an approachcould be that waters needing both point and nonpoint source controls tomeet water quality standards might be excluded from both programs.EPA believes that states should make continuous progress toward the attainmentof water quality standards as required by the Act, and that controls onthe point source contribution of a priority pollutant should not be delayedor omitted while awaiting effective controls on nonpoint sources of thepollutant. In cases where there are significant loadings of a toxic pollutantfrom nonpoint sources, and effluent limits on the point sources by themselvesmay not bring the water into compliance with the applicable water qualitystandard, an ICS will satisfy the language of section 304(l)(1)(D) if theeffluent limits in the ICS are consistent with a wasteload allocation forthe discharger. (See section III.D.1 for discussion on why EPA believesthat this approach is reasonable and appropriate.)To address commenters concerns that an ICS does not address nonpoint sources,EPA requires that the supporting documentation for an ICS show evidencethat the impact of nonpoint sources on the identified segment has beenconsidered during the preparation of total maximum daily loads (TMDLs)and wasteload allocations (WLAs). EPA also encourages permitting authoritiesto utilize all available authorities to control nonpoint sources, includingsection 319 of the CWA.Many commenters felt that the language in condition (c) in the proposedrule was too subjective, vague and was not authorized by the statute. EPAagrees and has deleted condition (c) in response to these comments.In addition, EPA has deleted Exhibit A from the final rule. Exhibit A,which appeared in the proposed rule, was an illustration for determiningif the concentration of a priority pollutant is entirely or substantiallydue to discharges from point sources. This chart has been deleted sinceit caused considerable confusion and because it illustrated only sevenof myriad possible discharge scenarios, all of which could not be illustrated.Finally, the proposed word ``initial'' has been replaced by the word ``existing''in final condition (a). EPA believes the word ``initial'' is vague, andthe word ``existing'' more clearly describes the situation where existinglimits on one or more point sources, if made effective, would bring thewater into compliance with an applicable water quality standard, and thereforeit should be listed on the paragraph (B) list. This change does not signifyan expansion of the listing requirements, but is a correction in the languagewhich makes it consistent with other parts of today's rule. For example,this change is consistent with section III.B.1 of today's preamble whichclarifies that if the water was not meeting or was not expected to meetthat water quality standard on or before February 4, 1989 due entirelyor substantially to discharges from point sources, it must be listed onthe paragraph (B) list even if the point sources on a water already haveexisting water quality-based effluent limitations designed to meet a waterquality standard. No commenters requested this change in the language,but EPA believed it was necessary to make the correction for the reasonsstated above.For the purposes of interpreting the term ``due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources,'' any discharge which meets the definitionof a point source under 40 CFR andSection;122.2 must be considered as suchfor the purposes of listing waters and point sources under section 304(l)(1)(B),including discharges from combined sewer overflows (CSOs) and dischargesfrom stormwater outfalls. In addition, water quality impairments due toin-place sediments which have been substantially or entirely contaminatedor deposited by priority pollutant loadings currently being dischargedfrom an active and operating point source subject to section 402(a) ofthe CWA, must be listed under paragraph (B) of section 304(l) and the dischargermust be listed under paragraph (C). If the sediments have been contaminatedor deposited entirely or almost entirely by nonpoint sources or by a facilityor site which is no longer in operation or is abandoned, and thereforecannot be issued an NPDES permit, EPA would not consider the contaminationto be due to a point source when evaluating whether a water should be listedon the paragraph (B) list. EPA emphasizes that the sediments themselvesare not considered point sources, but the contamination or deposition ofthem by active and operating industrial or municipal facilities is consideredas contamination that is due to a point source.Some commenters asked for clarification on whether to list waters basedon exceedances of criteria in the water column or based on biological impairmentcaused by contaminated sediments. Waters may be listed on either basis.The evaluation for listing on the section 304(l)(1)(B) list is based onwhether there is an excursion or expected excursion above an applicablenarrative or numeric criterion for a priority pollutant which is designedto protect the designated uses. If the contaminated sediment is causingbiological damage it may be impairing the designated uses of a water, andtherefore a state's narrative criteria for toxics may be exceeded. Or ifthe sediment is releasing a priority pollutant back into the water columnin amounts that exceed the allowable concentrations, the state's numericcriteria is being exceeded. In either of these situations, the waters,as well as the appropriate dischargers, should be listed, if the contaminationis due entirely or substantially to point sources.Some commenters thought that EPA intended states to list waters where thesediment is contaminated due entirely or almost entirely to nonpoint sourcesor inactive point source dischargers. EPA does not intend this. Also, EPAdid not intend to suggest in the proposed rule, as some commenters believed,that if there is a water quality problem due to in-place sediments whichhave been contaminated entirely or almost entirely by an abandoned or inactivepoint source or by nonpoint sources, that the water must be listed if thereis <T3>any</T3> active point source of the same priority pollutant. The waterwould only be listed if the active point source is entirely or substantiallycontributing to or causing the sediment contamination, which is in turnimpairing the uses of the water. Thus, for listing purposes, EPA is treatingdischargers which are contaminating sediments in the same manner as otherdischargers.When a state evaluates whether a water is impaired ``due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources,'' the evaluation must be based only onthe contribution of one priority pollutant at a time from the point sources,and only for priority pollutants. Therefore, a water quality problem dueto a pollutant which is not a priority pollutant may not be taken intoaccount when determining whether a water should or should not be listedon the paragraph (B) list for priority pollutants. For example, if a waterdoes not meet the water quality criterion for chromium (a priority pollutant)from point source contributions, nor does it meet the water quality criterionfor pH (a conventional pollutant) from either point or nonpoint sources,the state must still list this water on the (B) list, because of the chromiumpoint source contribution. Even though a water may still not meet its designateduses due to another pollutant, EPA does not want the states to delay controllinga priority pollutant of concern from a point source. (As a matter of policy,EPA urges states to attach the same priority to the identification andcontrol of all non-priority pollutants of concern.)One commenter expressed concern about being able to develop ICSs for combinedsewer overflows and stormwater outfalls. EPA acknowledges that writingpermits for these sources may be difficult. However, ease in writing theindividual control strategy or ability to meet appropriate permit limitsis not the basis for listing waters and point sources under section 304(l).Another commenter contended that under section 402 of the CWA urban stormwaterdischarges do not have to meet permit limits until 1994 at the earliest.EPA disagrees. Section 402(p)(2)(E) of the CWA states that ``[a] dischargefor which the Administrator or the State determines that the stormwaterdischarge contributes to a violation of a water quality standard or isa significant contributor of pollutants to waters of the United States''is exempted from the general rule that EPA or the state cannot requirea permit for stormwater discharges prior to October 1, 1992. Stormwaterdischarges listed pursuant to section 304(l) qualify for this exemption.Furthermore, Congress did not specifically exempt any categories of pointsources from the requirements of section 304(l).<ITAG tagnum="81"> 3. Preparation and Review of the Lists</ITAG>The CWA requires the states to have submitted the four section 304(l)(1)lists to EPA for review and approval on or before February 4, 1989. Paragraphs130.10(d)(1)-(3), promulgated as part of EPA's interpretive rule for theWater Quality Act on January 4, 1989 (<T4>Federal Register </T4>Vol. 54 No. 2 at 216) already require this submission,along with the requirement that these lists be reviewed and approved ordisapproved by EPA.In addition to paragraphs (4) and (5) discussed above, today's rules alsoadd paragraphs (6) through (11) to subsection 130.10(d). Paragraphs (6)and (7) describe the data that each state must use in developing the lists,and the documentation that each must provide to EPA when submitting liststo EPA. Paragraph (8) describes the basis upon which EPA will approve ordisapprove a state's lists. Paragraphs (6) through (8) are discussed inthis section of the preamble. New paragraphs (9), (10) and (11) discusspublic notice and comment procedures and are discussed in section III.D.2of this preamble.a. <T3>Use of Existing and Readily Available Data. </T3>Because EPA believesthat states should build on the work that has already been done in thecontinuous process of assessing water quality, today's amendments allowstates to use existing and readily available data when they develop theirlists. Also, the ambitious deadlines of the CWA require EPA to forgo arequirement for lengthy monitoring designs and extensive collection ofnew data and to rely on existing and readily available data. The regulationwhich allows states to rely on existing and readily available data appearsin proposed paragraph 130.10(d)(6).To assist states in deciding what existing and readily available data theyshould rely on, EPA is designating sixteen categories of waters about which,as a minimum, each state must assemble and evaluate all existing and readilyavailable data. These categories of waters are described in paragraph 130.10(d)(6).EPA considers the existing and readily available information and data aboutthe categories of waters described in paragraph 130.10(d)(6) to be theminimum data and information that a state must assemble and evaluate whenpreparing lists in order for EPA to have an adequate basis to approve ordisapprove the lists. States should obtain any other additional data andinformation needed to identify and determine as accurately as possiblewhich waters and point sources to list.These categories reflect what EPA considers to be the minimum existingand readily available water quality data and information that a state andEPA can reasonably obtain. This existing data includes data that statesshould have developed in the course of reviewing and revising water qualitystandards, evaluating needs for technology-based or water quality-basedcontrols, developing total maximum daily loads (TMDLs), wasteload allocationsand load allocations (WLAs/LAs), issuing permits, and monitoring to determinethe effectiveness of pollution controls. Furthermore, EPA is requiringthat the states assemble and evaluate this minimum existing and readilyavailable data because it encourages cooperation and communication amongthe many Federal, state and local government agencies and private organizationsthat collect, analyze or report water quality data and information.EPA is requiring that these waters be evaluated for the purposes of developingthe three lists of waters required by section 304(l) because they are eitherwaters which have been reported by the state or other government or privatesector agencies as failing to meet water quality standards or as havinga high potential for not meeting water quality standards, or they are waterswhich receive point source discharges. EPA believes that if a state evaluatesall waters in these categories it will identify virtually all waters thatmay need to be listed.Information and data about the categories of waters described in paragraph130.10(d) are of two general types. The first is existing and readily availabledata and reports from Federal, state, local and private sectors. The secondis dilution calculation results generated by EPA and the states for useas a screening tool. These two types of information are discussed below.There are many existing lists, reports and assessments that provide valuableinformation to states when identifying and preparing lists of waters. Newparagraph 130.10(d)(6) designates the minimum information and reports whicheach state must assemble and evaluate in order to identify waters thatmeet the section 304(l) statutory requirements for listing. These includestate section 305(b) reports, Clean Lakes Assessments, the section 319Nonpoint Source Assessments, the National Priority List prepared underCERCLA, reports of adverse water quality conditions by the InternationalJoint Commission and the Great Lakes Water Quality Board, and the ToxicChemical Release Inventory developed pursuant to Title III of the SuperfundAmendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, among others. Beyond watersidentified by these specific reports, the final rule requires the stateto obtain any existing and readily available data about other specificwaters which should be considered for listing on one or more of the listsrequired by section 304(l); for example, waters where fishing bans andrecreational restrictions are in effect, waters which have had repeatedfishkills, and waters where there are waterfowl or wildlife consumptionadvisories or bans. Appendix B of the Final Guidance for Implementationof Requirements under section 304(l) of the Clean Water Act as Amended(March 1988) lists other available data sources that should be consulted.A few commenters requested that other reports or sources of data be citedin the regulations, to ensure that the states review them. EPA has notnamed these specific reports in the regulatory language because there aremany reports or data sources that a state could use and they can not allbe named specifically in the regulations. However, subparagraph 130.10(d)(6)(xiii)is broad enough that it includes any such reports or information sourcesthat report on water quality. Also, EPA has mentioned many of these reportssuggested by the commenters as examples of possible data and informationsources.The second general type of information that EPA is requiring that the statesconsider, as a minimum, is screening information developed using dilutioncalculations. Dilution calculations should be conducted to indicate possibleexcursions above numeric water quality criteria within state water qualitystandards (or EPA water quality criteria where state numeric criteria arenot available). Dilution calculations should be performed for, but notlimited to, all point source discharges of priority pollutants, ammoniaand chlorine to help identify waters and dischargers for listing on anyof the lists. At a minimum, waters with primary industrial major and minorpoint source dischargers, major publicly-owned treatment works (POTWs),and waters with other major point source dischargers must be screened forexpected excursions above the water quality criteria by performing dilutioncalculations using site-specific data, or, if necessary, data based onnational estimates. EPA emphasizes that to list a water on the Paragraph(B) list, the state does not necessarily need to have enough data to indicateexactly which point source or sources may be causing any observed or projectedcriteria excursions or use impairments. It is sufficient that the dataindicate that the applicable water quality standards are not being achievedor are not expected to be achieved due entirely or substantially to dischargesfrom point sources. After identifying the water for listing on the paragraph(B) list, the state should then obtain as much discharger-specific dataas necessary to identify the dischargers which may be causing or expectedto cause the criteria excursions, and then place these dischargers on theparagraph (C) list.Where ambient data on criteria excursions are being used to identify waters,the state may use the criteria for designated use support outlined in Figure1 of EPA's Guidelines for the Preparation of the 1988 State Water QualityAssessment section 305(b) Report. Figure 1 provides guidelines to statesin determining the degree to which waters are supporting their designateduses based on the frequency of criteria excursions and comparison of meanvalues to criteria.Some commenters said that reliance on existing and readily available datacould lead to inaccurate or unreliable results and that EPA should clarifythat states should make their listing decisions on existing and readilyavailable accurate data. Also, EPA should allow states to use professionaljudgment in resolution of conflicting data. EPA expects the state to determineas much as possible the accuracy and validity of their existing and readilyavailable data and information about the sixteen categories of waters,or about any other waters, when developing the lists. EPA does not expectthe states to rely on old or inaccurate data or information. If the statefinds that much of its existing and readily available data is unreliable,EPA strongly encourages the states to obtain more current additional datawhenever possible. Also, EPA expects states to exercise best professionaljudgment when faced with conflicting data.Some commenters felt that requiring the states to use all existing andreadily available data about the sixteen categories of waters was too prescriptiveor burdensome. EPA is requiring the states to examine the categories inorder to ensure that all possible sources of existing and readily availabledata are considered. It may be that a state has found that a particularcategory of data is unsuitable for use. To accommodate this situation,the regulations provide that the state submit its reasons for a decisionnot to evaluate any particular category of waters. If a state demonstratesto EPA that it has reviewed all existing and readily available data aboutthe sixteen categories as appropriate, it can reduce the ``second-guessing''by EPA, which some commenters were concerned about, when EPA reviews thelists.EPA's intent in requiring that states review and evaluate at a minimumall existing and readily available data on the sixteen categories of waterin paragraph 130.10(d), is to be sure that EPA and the states cast a broadnet in the list development and review process. The states are expectedto review and evaluate these data for accuracy and reliability, determinewhich waters are candidates for listing, and then review and evaluate andgather, if necessary, more site-specific data on these candidates in orderto make their final listing decisions. In short, these categories of watersare the minimum beginning universe of waters which states should evaluatefor waters qualified for the section 304(l) lists. These latter would bethe waters that the data and information show, after assurance of its reliabilityand the use of professional judgment, cannot reasonably be anticipatedby the state to attain or maintain applicable water quality standards asdescribed in section 304(l)(1) of the CWA.b. <T3>Documentation of Data and Methodologies. </T3>Paragraph 130.10(d)(7)requires that each state submit to EPA, together with its lists of watersand sources, documentation of all data and methodologies used by the stateto develop the lists.Subparagraph (i) of (d)(7) requires each state to submit a descriptionof the methodology used by the state to develop each of the lists of watersand point sources required by section 304(l). This description of methodologyshould include assumptions and criteria used by the state when reviewingand analyzing data and information.Subparagraph (ii) requires the state to provide a description of the dataand information used by the state, and to specifically address which ofthe categories of waters described in paragraph (d)(6) were used. If astate does not assemble and evaluate data about one of these categories,subparagraph (iii) requires the state to provide the rational for decidingnot to do so as part of its documentation.Subparagraph (iv) requires the state to provide any other information thatthe Regional Administrator requests in order to review the state's submissionof lists. Specifically, subparagraph (iv) requires a state, if EPA requests,to demonstrate good cause for not including a water or discharger on oneor more of the required section 304(l)(1) lists.``Good cause'' may include, but is not limited to, the following:andbullet; More recent or more accurate data,andbullet; More accurate water quality modeling,andbullet; Flaws in the original analysis that led to the water being identifiedin one of the categories, orandbullet; Changes in conditions, e.g., new control equipment, or eliminationof discharges.These above documentation requirements are necessary because a RegionalAdministrator's office may not maintain all the available water qualityand discharger data for all of its states. Therefore, part of the reviewby EPA of a state's submission must necessarily include a review of thedata, assumptions and criteria used by the state for listing waters andpoint sources to ensure that they are consistent with the statutory andregulatory requirements for listing. For example, a state's documentationshould reflect that the state considered stormwater outfalls as a pointsource when determining whether a water is imparied due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources.Some commenters said that EPA's request for documentation in andSection;130.10(d)(7) is burdensome and without statutory authority. Section 304(l)requires EPA to review and approve or disapprove each state's lists. (Seesection III.D. of this preamble which discusses in detail EPA's authorityto approve and disapprove lists.) EPA remains convinced that in order toreview a state's lists adequately, the Agency must know on what basis thestate made its decisions to list or not list waters and point sources,and must be able to review all existing and readily available data andinformation used for those decisions. Because this information is crucialto EPA's review of a state's lists, the Agency does not view these requirementsto supply documentation on methodologies, criteria and assumptions as overlyburdensome and did not revise the regulatory language as commenters requested.In addition, because the state or EPA must provide adequate public participationfor these lists, the state should be documenting its decisions and mothodologiesfor this purpose. Therefore these requirements to develop and submit documentationshould not represent a significant additional burden to the states.Two commenters requested that the language in andSection; 130.10(d)(7)(iv)which allows the Regional Administrator to request any other additionalinformation be revised to restrict the Regional Administrator to requestinginformation that is reasonable, necessary or pertinent to determine theadequacy of the state's lists. EPA agrees with this comment and has incorporatedit into the regulatory language at subparagraph 130.10(d)(7)(iv). Somecommenters felt that the ``good cause'' language in this section is essentially``second-guessing'' the state and is burdensome to the state. EPA relieson its rationale for requesting documentation, discussed above, for itsdecision not to revise this language pursuant to these comments. In addition,EPA views the procedure for a state to submit additional information asa way to ensure that EPA does not disapprove a state's decisions that arefounded on an adequate basis. EPA emphasizes that a state does not haveto automatically submit ``good cause'' when submitting its lists to EPAfor review, but only when the Regional Administrator requests such informationon specific waterbodies or dischargers.c. <T3>Review of Lists by EPA. </T3>Section 304(1) requires that all statessubmit all four lists described above to EPA no later than February 4,1989. Upon receiving the lists from each state, the Regional Administratoris required to review and then approve or disapprove each state's lists.If a state fails to submit a list or if a state submits an inadequate list,then EPA must either entirely or partially disapprove the list. Section304(1)(2) gives EPA 120 days to approve or disapprove a state's list andwhere EPA entirely or partially disapproves a state's list, EPA will, incooperation with the state, develop the final list.In order for EPA to complete its review of a state's lists, the state musthave met the data and documentation requirements in proposed paragraphs(6) and (7). The Regional Administrator will approve each list if the statehas met the regulatory requirements for listing under 40 CFR 130.10, anddisapprove each list that does not.If, after reviewing the state lists, available data and any required documentation,the Regional Administrator is satisfied that the state has identified andappropriately listed all waters, then EPA will approve the lists. (SeeSection III.D of this preamble for a detailed discussion of review andapproval and disapproval of lists and individual control strategies.)Some commenters asked whether EPA is intending to apply these requirementsto lists submitted before the final rule becomes effective, and arguedthat to do so would be to apply the regulation retroactively, which isprohibited. The regulations promulgated today will apply to all Regionaldecisions issued after the effective date of today's rule. EPA does notview this as applying the regulations retroactively. Rather, EPA is applyingthe criteria for review of lists to decisions it makes in the future. Some commenters asked EPA to include in today's rule a procedure for removingwaters or point sources from the section 304(l) lists. Listing of watersand point sources under section 304(l) is a one-time activity. Therefore,it is unnecessary to develop regulations for removing waters and pointsources from a list. The public comment and review period provided by EPAor the state provides opportunity for waters or point sources to be deletedfrom, or added to, a list.C. Individual Control StrategiesIn addition to the four lists required by section 304(l)(1), the statesmust prepare and submit to EPA an individual control strategy (ICS) foreach point source on the (C) list. This section describes what EPA willapprove as an ICS.On January 4, 1989, EPA codified sections 304(l)(1)(D), 304(l)(2), and304(l)(3) of the CWA into a new section in Part 123_andSection; 123.46. Section123.46(a) requries the states to submit ICSs to EPA on or before February4, 1989, and andSection; 123.46(b) requires EPA to approve or disapprovethe ICSs by June 4, 1989.Today's rules add new paragraphs (c)-(f) to andSection;123.46. Paragraph(c) defines an ICS. Paragraph (d) describes the petitions submitted undersection 304(l)(3). Paragraph (e) describes the procedures EPA will useto approve or disapprove ICSs, and paragraph (f) establishes the criteriathat EPA will use to evaluate an ICS. Today's regulations also re-promulgate andSection;123.46(a). EPA originallypromulgated this regulation on January 4, 1989, but it is necessary toamend this language so the regulation more accurately reflects EPA's approachfor implementing section 304(l). The new language clarifies that an ICSis required for each point source under section 304(l)(1)(C) rather thaneach water segment identified under section 304(l)(1)(B). <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Description of an Individual Control Strategy </ITAG>Section 304(l)(1)(D) provides that an individual control strategy must``* * * produce a reduction in the discharge of toxic pollutants from pointsources * * *'' identified under section 304(l)(1)(C), which is ``* * *sufficient, in combination with existing controls on point and nonpointsources of pollution, to achieve the applicable water quality standardas soon as possible, but not later than three years after the date of theestablishment of such strategy.'' These elements of an individual controlstrategy are codified at 40 CFR 123.46(a). Today's regulations define an ICS as a final NPDES permit, a draft NPDESpermit with a schedule for issuing a final permit, or, for an on-site responseaction under CERCLA, the decision document for the response action. EPAreceived many comments on the definition of an ICS. The following preamblediscussion responds to these comments and clarifies some aspects of thedefinition. EPA has determined that, for point source discharges to meet the requirementsof section 304(l), an ICS must consist of a draft or final NPDES permitfor each point source on the (C) list, plus supporting documentation thatthe permit has adequately considered the impact from other discharges onthe identified segment. ICSs are required for both currently permitteddischarges and for point sources identified on the (C) list that do nothave NPDES permits. A sufficient ICS, therefore, consists of the controlsfor each such point source (NPDES permit limitations and a schedule forachieving such limitations if they cannot be achieved upon permit issuance)and documentation which shows that the controls selected are appropriateand adequate (<T3>i.e.</T3>, fact sheets with information on total maximum daily loadsand wasteload allocations). Enforcement orders and consent decrees, bythemselves, are not adequate substitutes for ICSs. However, an enforcementorder or judicial decree based on a final and sufficient NPDES permit maybe a part of the supporting documentation for the ICS, provided the ICSsatisfies all applicable provisions of section 304(l) of the CWA. EPA believes this is the correct interpretation of the term ``individualcontrol strategy'' because paragraph (D) of section 304(l)(1) states thatan ICS must reduce discharges of toxic pollutants through ``effluent limitationsunder section 402'' of the CWA. Section 402 of the CWA establishes theNPDES program, and the effluent limitations in NPDES permits are the primarycontrol mechanism that EPA and the states use to reduce point source dischargesof pollutants. By inserting a reference to the NPDES program in paragraph(D) EPA believes that Congress intended for an NPDES permit to be the essentialelement of an ICS. The comments on EPA's definition of an ICS focused on two issues: First,an ICS should include more than just NPDES permits for point sources; andsecond an ICS should be developed for a water segment, not for each individualpoint source. EPA considered these comments but decided to promulgate thedefinition unchanged, for the reasons discussed below. a. <T3>Types of controls. </T3>In arguing that an ICS should be broader thanan NPDES permit, some commenters requested that EPA approve state waterquality management plans as ICSs. EPA remains convinced that such planswould not satisfy the requirements of section 304(1) because these plansare not directly enforceable (although they are binding on the states)and therefore they cannot ensure, by themselves, that limitations willbe achieved within the deadlines of section 304(l). This problem of enforceabilitycould be solved by defining ICSs to include not only the plans but alsothe permits necessary to implement them. EPA is rejecting such an approachbecause the two years allowed by section 304(l) for developing ICSs doesnot allow for a sequential listing of waters, development of state plansand development of permits based on the plans. To meet the section 304(l)deadlines states would, for the most part, be compelled to develop permitsbefore completing the planning process. EPA believes that this suggestionwould not make good use of the planning process, and would consume resourceswithout improving ICSs. Several commenters argued that EPA's definition of an ICS makes point sourcesresponsible for nonpoint source discharges and urged EPA to require nonpointsource controls as a part of ICSs. EPA agrees with the commenters thatnonpoint sources can be an important toxics problem on some of the watersidentified for control under section 304(l). EPA is not incorporating nonpointsource controls into ICSs because EPA does not believe that Congress gaveEPA the authority to impose nonpoint source controls as a part of an ICS.The statute clearly contemplates the implementation of ICSs through NPDESpermits (through the reference to ``effluent limitations under section402''), which only provide point source controls. The legislative historysupports this interpretation. <T3>See </T3>Rep. No. 99-1004, 99th Cong., 2d Sess. pages 126-130. Furthermore,Congress added section 319, which addresses nonpoint source programs, atthe same time as section 304(l). Section 319 requires identification ofwaters that need nonpoint source controls to meet water quality standards,and requires submission of management programs which identify, among otherthings, methods for controlling nonpoint sources of pollution. BecauseCongress wrote a separate section for nonpoint source programs, EPA doesnot believe that Congress intended for EPA to establish a nonpoint sourcecontrol program under section 304(l). As stated in the proposal, EPA urgesstates to implement nonpoint source controls wherever necessary to meetwater quality standards. To further encourage nonpoint source controlsEPA interprets the statute's mandate to consider ``existing controls onpoint and nonpoint sources of pollution,'' section 304(l)(1)(D), as includingnonpoint source controls that will be in place by June of 1992. (EPA explainsthe meaning of this interpretation more thoroughly in the March, 1988 guidance.)Some commenters argued that EPA's definition of an ICS does not accountfor multiple discharges to a receiving water. EPA disagrees. An ICS mustbe consistent with any total maximum daily loads (TMDLs) for the watersegment and wasteload allocations developed for the discharge (where thewasteload allocation is approved by EPA pursuant to 40 CFR 130.7). An ICSmust also include documentation indicating that a water will meet all applicablewater quality standards. EPA believes this definition implements the congressionaldesire for coordination in the evaluation and control of point sourcesdischarging the same pollutants to the same water segments.   b. <T3>EPA's paint source-based approach. </T3>EPA's definition of an ICSand the amendments to andSection; 123.46(a) require an ICS for each pointsource on the (C) list. Some commenters noted that section 304(l)(1)(D)requires ICSs for ``each such segment'' identified in paragraph (B). EPAacknowledges that section 304(l)(1)(D) refers to waterbody segments. EPAconsidered defining an ICS as the aggregation of all permits and supportingdocumentation for a water segment. EPA is not adopting this expanded definitionof an ICS because congressional intent in enacting section 304(l) is betteraccomplished by retaining the proposed definition. If permits were aggregatedto form an ICS for a water segment then the ICS could not be approved,and in many cases would not be implemented, until all permits for the watersegment were developed and incorporated into the ICS. Furthermore, theaggregation of permits would result in the same level of control as single-permitICSs. Given the deadlines that Congress imposed in section 304(l) it isclear that Congress established a premium on expeditious attainment ofwater quality standards. EPA sees no reason to delay an ICS until all permitsfor a water segment are developed. In addition to finalizing the proposeddefinition, EPA is amending andSection; 123.46(a) to make clear that ICSsshould be submitted for each point source on the (C) list. EPA rejected the idea of creating a new mechanism for controlling pointsources under section 304(l) because a new mechanism is not necessary toimplement section 304(l), and the deadlines in section 304(l) do not allowenough time to design, promulgate and implement a new mechanism for controllingdischarges of pollutants to surface waters. In urging EPA to take a segment-based approach some commenters argued thatsuch an approach is necessary to account for multiple discharges to a watersegment. However, an ICS must be consistent with wasteload allocationsand must include documentation indicating that the effluent limitationsare sufficient to meet the wasteload allocation. EPA believes that theserequirements implement the congressional desire for coordination when evaluatingand controlling point sources discharges of the same pollutant to the samewater segment. c. <T3>Approval of permits that are not yet effective. </T3>Where a statedemonstrates that a final permit cannot be issued by February 4, 1989,a draft permit and supporting documentation may qualify as an ICS. However,such a draft permit must accompanied by a schedule indicating that thefinal permit will be issued on or before February 4, 1990. One commenterasked EPA to require a more burdensome showing from states before allowinguntil February 4, 1990 to issue the final permit. EPA believes that thesection 304(l) requirement for achieving controls as soon as possible alongwith a deadline for issuing a final permit is sufficient to guide the statesand regions in meeting the requirements of section 304(l). EPA's definition of an ICS includes draft permits because the descriptionof an ICS in section 304(l)(1)(D) allows for such an interpretation, andbecause it is unrealistic to expect final NPDES permits to be preparedfor every point source on the (C) lists within the ambitious deadlinesof section 304(l). Water quality-based effluent limits can be technicallydifficult to prepare and are often subject to extensive public commentduring the permit development process. Today's proposal to include draftpermits in the definition of an ICS requires the permitting authority toprepare the effluent limitations required by andSection; 304(l)(1)(D), butat the same time, gives the states the necessary flexibility to meet theambitious deadlines of section 304(l). A draft permit prepared as an ICS under section 304(l) must be issued asa final permit within one year of establishment of the ICS. Therefore,if a state submits a draft permit to EPA on or before February 4, 1989,the ICS must be issued as a final NPDES permit on or before February 4,1990. In the case of state-issued ICSs, the one year time period allowsEPA to exercise its authority under section 304(l)(2) if a state failsto issue a final NPDES permit within the one year time period. In the caseof EPA-issued ICSs, the ICS may be a draft permit, and like the states,EPA would also have up to one year in which to issue a final NPDES permit.Some commenters argued that EPA's choice of a one year deadline for a stateto finalize draft permits was arbitrary and the connection to EPA's implementationof section 304(l) was too tenuous to support it. EPA believes that to ensuresuccess of the section 304(l) program no ICS should be unconditionallyapproved until it represents the state's final decision to implement controls.If an approval contingent upon a final decision by a state must be subsequentlydisapproved, EPA must have sufficient time to prepare an ICS by its deadlineof June 4, 1990. EPA believes that allowing states more than one year toissue final permits would jeopardize EPA's ability to meet the section304(l) deadlines. In addition, EPA believes that one year is sufficienttime for the states to develop final permits from approved drafts. Where EPA approves a draft permit as an ICS, EPA's approval is automaticallyconditioned on the state's meeting the schedule for issuing the final permit.If a state fails to meet the schedule for issuing the final permit, thenEPA may exercise its authority to disapprove the ICS and implement section304(l). An NPDES permit usually becomes effective 30 days after a final decisionto issue or modify the permit unless an evidentiary hearing is requestedunder 40 CFR 124.74. Evidentiary hearings can delay the effective dateof the conditions challenged in the permit. Because these potential delayscould jeopardize the ability of EPA and the states to meet the deadlinesin section 304(l), and because a final permit reflects the final decisionof the permitting authority with respect to the permit, EPA will accepta final (but not necessarily fully effective) NPDES permit as an ICS. d. <T3>CERCLA sites. </T3>As EPA noted in the proposal, it is possible thatsome CERCLA sites will be subject to section 304(l) because these sitescan be point source discharges of a priority pollutant. If a CERCLA sitequalifies for the (C) list under section 304(l), then the site must alsosatisfy section 304(l)(1)(D) relating to ICSs, including the deadlinesin section 304(l). For ``off-site'' response actions, the CERCLA site dischargermust obtain an NPDES permit, and will therefore satisfy section 304(l)in the same way as other point sources subject to section 304(l)(1)(C).For ``on-site'' actions however, the discharger must meet all ``applicableor relevant and appropriate requirements'' of the CWA, but is exempt undersection 121 of CERCLA from the procedural requirements of the NPDES permittingprocess. Therefore, on-site actions that are subject to section 304(l)will satisfy paragraph (D) of section 304(l) through compliance with applicableor relevant and appropriate requirements under the CWA, as described inthe decision document for that on-site response action. Although EPA expectsthat there will be relatively few CERCLA sites subject to section 304(l),EPA emphasizes that the ICS for any such CERCLA site is subject to thedeadlines in section 304(l). The proposed definition of an ICS at andSection;123.46(c) includes CERCLA decision documents for on-site response actions.e. <T3>Non-approved states. </T3>A state that is not approved by EPA to administerthe NPDES program will fulfill its obligations under section 304(l)(1)(D)by preparing and submitting wasteload allocations to the Regional Officesfor EPA review and approval. Under the NPDES program, non-approved statesassist EPA in issuing permits by providing EPA with background information,wasteload allocations, and certifications under section 401 of the CWA.EPA uses the wasteload allocations to prepare the NPDES permits for thestate. The role of non-approved states with respect to ICSs will be thesame as their role with respect to NPDES permits. Non-approved states areresponsible for preparing wasteload allocations for each point source onthe (C) list. The Regional Offices will prepare and issue, in cooperationwith non-approved states, final NPDES permits in the state. EPA receivedcomments both supporting and criticizing this interpretation of the roleof non-approved states. One commenter argued that the minimal role of non-approvedstates undermines EPA's definition of an ICS as an NPDES permit. EPA disagreeswith the commenter because section 304(l)(1)(D) provides that individualcontrol strategies are to achieve reductions in discharges from point sources``through the establishment of effluent limitations under section 402.''Non-approved states do not have the authority to establish effluent limitationsin NPDES permits. Therefore, the role of non-approved states is necessarilydifferent from that of approved states in implementing section 304(l).Furthermore, a non-approved state's role will not be minimal. PreparingWLA's and providing section 401 certifications requires the state to befully involved in the preparation of an ICS. Although state certificationsunder section 401 of the CWA are required for ICSs, EPA's regulations at40 CFR 124.53 provide that a state will be deemed to waive its right tocertify under section 401 of the CWA if the state fails to exercise thisright within 60 days from the date that EPA mails the draft permit to thestate. Section 304(l) establishes a three-year deadline for achieving water qualitystandards, whereas section 301(b)(1)(C) requires water quality standardsto be met by July 1, 1977. The different deadlines in the two sectionsraise the question of how the two sections interact. EPA believes thatCongress did not intend for section 304(l) to repeal the July 1977 deadlinein section 301(b)(1)(C). Rather, Congress recognized that permittees willneed a reasonable amount of time, not to exceed three years, to complywith new effluent limits that are necessary to achieve new water qualitystandards, or re-interpretations of existing water quality standards. Onthe other hand, there is no indication that Congress intended for section304(l) to be an extension for permittees who have already failed to complywith effluent limitations. An ICS may not extend a compliance schedulefor achieving effluent limits if the permittee has already failed to abideby the compliance schedule. Also, where new effluent limits will requireconstruction or other activities (<T3>e.g. </T3>wastewater treatment system optimization, pretreatment programimplementation, etc.) an ICS may include a compliance schedule for suchactivities. The reason for this distinction is that section 304(l) requiresthat water quality standards be met ``as soon as possible.'' If a permitalready includes a compliance schedule, then the permitting authority hasalready given the permittee a reasonable time to comply with effluent limitsand therefore achieve water quality standards. Therefore, where a complianceschedule has not been met, the ICS cannot extend the schedule. Rather,an enforcement order may be required as part of the supporting documentationfor the ICS. EPA received comments requesting EPA to extend the deadline for compliancewith the effluent limits imposed pursuant to section 304(l). EPA does nothave the authority to extend these statutory deadlines. EPA does, however,have the authority to exercise its enforcement discretion. The followingdiscussion explains the range of actions EPA may take in appropriate cases.It is possible that some permittees may not meet the effluent limits onor before the deadline in section 304(l) for achieving applicable waterquality standards. For example, the treatment technology may not be immediatelyavailable to reduce the discharge of a priority pollutant to the levelsnecessary to protect aquatic life and human health. In such cases, theNPDES permit may contain a schedule of compliance that leads to compliancewith section 304(l) and other requirements of the CWA. (Note, however,that a schedule of compliance must require compliance no later than applicablestatutory deadlines.) If the permittee does not achieve effluent limits within the time specifiedin the permit (which must be no later than the applicable deadline in section304(l)), the CWA provides for a range of enforcement actions. These actionsare provided for in section 309 of the CWA and include administrative orders,administrative penalty orders, and civil or criminal judicial actions.The appropriate enforcement response is determined on a case-by-case basis.In limited cases in the past, EPA has issued administrative orders concurrentlywith an NPDES permit where the effluent limits are effective immediatelyupon permit issuance. Factors which are considered when determining theappropriate enforcement response include but are not limited to: the potentialimpact of the discharge on human health or the environment; the compliancehistory of the permittee; and any good faith efforts by the permittee toachieve compliance. EPA recognizes that there may be situations where compliance with applicablewater quality standards will require ICSs for a number of point sourceson a stream segment, or may require nonpoint source controls. More thanone point source may contribute the same priority pollutant to a waterbodyidentified on the ``B'' list, and therefore, controls on only one pointsource may not achieve water quality standards. In other cases where thereare significant loadings of a toxic pollutant from nonpoint sources, effluentlimits for the point sources, by themselves, may not attain and maintainapplicable water quality standards. (See the discussion of the phrase ``entirelyor substantially'' in section III.B.2 of this preamble.) In these cases,it is EPA's position that an ICS may satisfy the language in paragraph(D) of section 304(l), and in andSection; 123.46(c), (which require the ICSto achieve water quality standards), if the effluent limits for the pointsources are consistent with a wasteload allocation for the point source.This approach allows the permitting authority to develop an ICS for eachpoint source that, together with other point or nonpoint source controls,is designed to attain and maintain applicable water quality standards.This approach is also consistent with EPA's existing surface water toxicscontrol program, in which each point source is obligated to reduce itscontribution of a pollutant according to its wasteload allocation. Theresult of this approach should be substantial reductions in point sourcecontributions of priority pollutants, which is consistent with Congress'intent in enacting section 304(l). Where a waterbody on the (B) list has a significant nonpoint source ofa priority pollutant that could impede progress toward achieving waterquality standards, EPA and the states should address the nonpoint sourceusing all available authorities including state and local authorities andsection 319 of the CWA. (Note that where point and nonpoint sources onthe same waterbody contribute different priority pollutants, the degreeof nonpoint source contributions will not affect the decision whether tolist the water under paragraph B of section 304(l)(1). For more informationsee the discussion of the (B) list in section III.B of this preamble.)Nonpoint source loadings are included in the process of developing waterquality-based effluent limits for point sources because nonpoint sourcesare considered when developing TMDLs and WLAs under section 303(d) of theCWA. EPA's regulations at 40 CFR 130.2 require that TMDLs account for nonpointsource loadings. The regulations also specify that TMDLs provide for ``tradeoffs''between point sources and nonpoint sources, and that TMDLs submitted under40 CFR 130.7 must be approved by EPA. EPA emphasizes that nonpoint sourcecontrols can make significant improvements in water quality. For many waters,the most significant sources of pollutants are nonpoint sources. Nonpointsource controls are, in some cases, more cost-effective than point sourcecontrols, and the regulations at 40 CFR 130.2 provide that the relativecost of point source and nonpoint source controls may be considered (amongother factors such as reliability and technical achievability) when preparingTMDLs for the pollutant of concern. Where possible, EPA encourages thestates to use nonpoint source controls to meet the objectives of section304(l) of the CWA to the extent that nonpoint source controls are adoptedand implemented through appropriate state and Federal authorities.Section III.B.2 of this preamble explains that a waterbody may qualifyfor the (B) list if the source of the priority pollutant is sediment depositedor contaminated due to the discharge of an active point source subjectto section 402 of the CWA. For example, the effluent from an active pointsource discharge may contain priority pollutants that are deposited assediments in the receiving water, or the effluent may contaminate existingsediment in the receiving water. In such cases the sediment can interferewith the designated use of the water, and the releases can cause excursionsabove other applicable water quality standards. Where contaminated sedimentis caused by an active point source, it is EPA's position that the contaminationshould be characterized as ``due to the discharge from a point source''.Several commenters said that an NPDES permit could not require dredgingof sediments, and that EPA should not attempt to write ICSs for these sourcesbased on contamination of sediments. Today's regulations do not requirethis. Rather, EPA is requiring ICSs to contain the necessary effluent limitsto prevent further contamination of the sediment and water column. It isEPA's goal that the ICSs for these active point sources achieve applicablewater quality standrds within the time frames of section 304(l). However,because controls for in-place sediments raise unique problems for the NPDESprogram, an ICS for such a point source should, at a minimum, prevent additionalaccumulation or contamination of the sediments that are the source of thetoxic pollutant.Under EPA's interpretation of section 304(l), all permits for point sourcessubject to section 304(l)(1)(C), including final or effective permits,must be included in the review required by section 304(l). It is EPA'sposition that section 304(l) gives EPA the authority to reopen a permitbefore the term of the permit expires regardless of whether the permithas a reopener clause. EPA's authority under section 304(l) to reopen final and effective permitsis supported by the requirement that EPA implement ICSs where EPA disapproves,or the state fails to submit an adequate ICS. Given that ICSs must be implementedthrough limitations under section 402 the alternatives to reopening permitswould not necessarily meet the requirements of section 304(l)(1)(D). Thealternatives are: (1) Allow ICSs to be unenforceable plans that might incorporatelimitations under section 402 at some later time; (2) omit certain pointsources from the section 304(l) process because the permits for these pointsources are not due for review under 40 CFR 123.44; or (3) wait until apermit expires (possibly after the deadlines in section 304(l)) to changethe terms of the permit. None of these alternatives would satisfy the requirementthat ICSs attain water quality standards by the deadlines in section 304(l).Therefore, EPA will review, and possibly disapprove under section 304(l),final or effective permits regardless of whether the permit has a reopenerclause. Some commenters thought it inequitable to reopen a permit before it expires.EPA has attempted to ease the planning problems created by an unanticipatedchange in permit terms by requiring that the permit be in draft form threeyears before the permittee is required to comply with the limits, and infinal form two or more years before such compliance is required. Furthermore,the definition of an ICS as a draft or final NPDES permit, and the useof compliance schedules, give the permittees added flexibility in meetingthe requirements of section 304(l).One commenter requested that EPA apply the requirements of 40 CFR 123.44(which describe the procedures for EPA disapproval of state-issued NPDESpermits) to disapproval of ICSs in order to implement the congressionalrequirement that EPA issue the ICSs ``in cooperation with the state andafter opportunity for public comment.'' The commenter seemed to indicatethat EPA should apply these processes before the June 4, 1989 disapprovalof a state's ICS. Although EPA has solicited extensive informal cooperationwith the states in the approval/disapproval process, EPA believes thatthe formal requirement for cooperation with the states applies during EPA'sdevelopment of an ICS after disapproval. As the following discussion indicates,EPA does not believe that applying the requirements of andSection;123.44would be the best way to incorporate the requirement for cooperation withthe state in the development of the ICS.As EPA stated in the proposal, to implement section 304(l), EPA will useexisting procedures where possible. However, EPA will use the section 304(l)process where pre-existing regulatory procedures are inconsistent withthe section 304(l) review process. EPA is not requiring compliance withandSection;123.44 (the procedures for EPA's objections to state permits)because it would be inconsistent with the section 304(l) review process.Section 402 of the CWA establishes conditions that are prerequisites toEPA's authority to issue permits in approved states. For example, section402 requires an approved state to submit a permit to EPA for review andrequires EPA to object in writing within ninety days, as prerequisitesto EPA's authority to issue the permit. Although the procedures under section304(l) provide an equivalent opportunity for state-EPA cooperation in thedevelopment of permits, section 304(l) also gives EPA the authority toissue permits where the state fails to issue permits that satisfy section304(l). Under the existing regulations the state submits a proposed permitto EPA, and EPA then has 90 days to object to the terms of the permit.After EPA's objection, the state has 90 days to request a public hearingor to re-submit the permit to EPA. If EPA grants a public hearing, thestate may re-submit the permit within 30 days after the Administrator issuesthe post-hearing decision. If the state does not re-submit the permit withinthe time limits in andSection;123.44, the exclusive authority to issue thepermit passes to EPA.These procedures are not appropriate for the section 304(l) review process.First, EPA must review final or effective permits in the ICS review process,not just draft or proposed permits. Second, section 304(l) gives EPA adeadline by which to review an ICS, not the 90 days provided for in andSection;123.44.Third, section 304(l) makes no provision for the state to re-submit a disapprovedICS. Rather, section 304(l) directs EPA to work in cooperation with thestate in preparing and implementing EPA's ICSs. Finally, section 304(l)requires EPA to provide for public notice and an opportunity to commenton the ICSs, not just an opportunity to request a hearing as provided underandSection;123.44. Taken as a whole the ICS review process is inconsistentwith the permit review process under andSection;123.44. Even though EPA isnot requiring the use of the procedures in andSection;123.46, EPA is sensitiveto the commenter's concern that states be as involved as possible in theissuance of any disapproved ICS. EPA regions are required to consult withthe state in the development of any ICSs by the language that was codifiedat andSection;123.46(a). Although EPA has a limited time in which to developthe ICS, EPA will seek a partnership with the states in the process. IfEPA issues the permit the state would review and certify the permit undersection 401 of the CWA. In addition, if EPA issues the permit, EPA willprovide for public comment on the ICS through the permit development process,which will provide another opportunity for the state to comment on EPA'sproposed ICS. For disapproved ICSs, EPA will use the existing permit issuance proceduresin Part 124 to issue these ICSs. After EPA disapproves an ICS that is adraft or final NPDES permit, the Agency will use the procedures describedin 40 CFR Part 124 to issue a final ICS. If EPA disapproves a decisiondocument for an on-site response action under CERCLA, the Agency will usethe procedures under CERCLA for issuing these ICSs.Some commenters asked EPA to explain the status of permits issued by EPAin approved states. EPA intends to treat permits issued by EPA in authorizedstates in the same manner as EPA-issued permits following EPA objectionto a state-issued permit. The Regional Administrator will issue the permitin accordance with 40 CFR Parts 121, 122, and 124 and any other guidelinesand requirements of the CWA.EPA expects that many of the ICSs that are subject to section 304(l) willbe final state-issued permits that EPA has previously reviewed under 40CFR Part 123. When a state submits an ICS to EPA for review under section304(l), any previous EPA decision to not object to the permit under Part123 does not waive EPA's authority to review and approve or disapprovethe ICS under section 304(l). If EPA reviewed a permit under Part 123,EPA reserves the right to review the same permit under the provisions ofsection 304(l).2. Technical Review Criteria. Section 304(l) requires an ICS to achieveapplicable water quality standards as soon as possible but not later thanthree years after the ICS is established. Although this language establishesa general standard for evaluating an ICS, the language says little aboutthe permit conditions necessary to ensure that applicable water qualitystandards will be achieved. EPA will use the review criteria in 40 CFR123.46(f) to evaluate whether an ICS meets the requirements of section304(l). The criteria that EPA will use to review ICSs are the same as thecriteria EPA uses to review the water quality-based effluent limits forany permit. Section III.A of this preamble discusses amendments to andSection;122.44(d). These amendments describe how to establish water quality-basedeffluent limits in NPDES permits. Effluent limits derived from water qualitystandards must satisfy andSection; 122.44(d). The regulations at andSection;123.46(f), provide that ICSs shall be reviewed according to the criteriain andSection; 122.44(d). EPA is also amending andSection; 123.44(c) to incorporatethe review criteria for ICSs into EPA's criteria for reviewing other permitsnot subject to section 304(l). Section 123.44(c) enumerates the criteriathat EPA may use to review state-issued permits. By using the same criteriafor reviewing ICSs and for reviewing permits that are not subject to section304(l), EPA is ensuring consistency in reviewing the technical adequacyof these two categories of permits.Some commenters asked whether EPA was intending to apply these requirementsto lists and ICSs submitted before this final rule becomes effective, andargued that to do so would be to apply the regulation retroactively, whichis prohibited. The regulations promulgated today will apply to EPA's decisionsissued after the effective date of today's regulations. EPA does not viewthis as applying the regulations retroactively. Rather, EPA is applyingthe criteria for review of lists and ICSs to decisions it makes after theeffective date of these regulations. Therefore, although these regulationswill not apply retroactively, EPA anticipates that the concepts embodiedin the rule would apply in most cases of EPA's review of lists and ICSsunless the discharger or the state can show why they should not apply.Where EPA disapproves an ICS, section 304(l)(3) requires EPA to implementsection 304(l) in a manner which will achieve applicable water qualitystandards on or before June 4, 1993. A final permit issued after EPA disapprovesthe permit under section 304(l) must include language in the fact sheetor statement of basis that identifies the permit as an ICS that satisfiesthe requirements of section 304(l) of the CWA. This requirement is similarto the language in draft permits subject to section 304(l) which identifiesthe permit as an ICS. The language in the final permit will identify forthe public and the regulated community those ICSs which satisfy the requirementsof section 304(l).D. EPA Review of Lists and Individual Control StrategiesSection 304(l) requires EPA to review and approve or disapprove the listsand ICSs submitted by a state. If a state fails to submit the lists orICSs, or if a state submits inadequate lists or ICSs, then EPA must disapprovethe lists or ICSs. Section 304(l)(2) gives EPA 120 days to approve or disapprovea state's ICSs, and where EPA disapproves an ICS, section 304(l)(3) requiresEPA to implement section 304(l)(1) on or before June 4, 1990. Today's rulesestablish the same review procedures for the lists as for ICSs. Althoughthe deadline established for ICSs does not explicitly apply to EPA's reviewof lists, EPA determined that it would not be appropriate for EPA to establishdifferent deadlines for the approval of lists. Some commenters argued thatEPA does not have the authority to approve or disapprove lists becausesection 304(l)(2) speaks only of the disapproval of ICSs. EPA believeshowever that the Agency is authorized to review both the lists and ICSs.First, the introduction in section 304(l)(1) requires all the lists andICSs to be submitted ``to the Administrator for review, approval, and implementation* * *.'' EPA's final rulemaking of January 4, 1989 codifies this languageat 40 CFR 123.46(a) and 130.10(d). Review and approval would be meaninglessif the statute did not allow disapproval where the review reveals inadequaciesin the lists submitted. Second, section 304(l) requires the Administratorto prepare ICSs where the state fails to submit them. EPA believes thatthis provision would not make sense if EPA did not also have the authorityto disapprove a state's decision to not submit an ICS to EPA for review.Such a disapproval depends on a review and possible disapproval of at leastthe paragraph (B) lists submitted under section 304(l)(1).The first step in the review process occurred when the states submittedtheir lists and ICSs to the Regional Offices for review. (The state's deadlinefor submitting the lists and ICSs was February 4, 1989.) The Regional Officesmust approve or disapprove the lists and ICSs by June 4, 1989.Several commenters asked how the process subsequent to the initial decisionwould work. The next steps in the process depend on the Regional Administrator'sdecision of approval or disapproval. If the Regional Administrator approvesa state's decisions with respect to the lists of waters and ICSs, and decidesthat additional public participation is unnecessary (see paragraph 2 below)the decision will be final and the permits will be implemented accordingto the normal permitting procedures (including permit appeal, judicialreview, enforcement, etc.). If the Regional Administrator takes publiccomment on the lists and ICSs then the region will consider the commentsand issue another decision regarding the lists and ICSs in approximatelyJanuary of 1990, but may take until June 4, 1990 to issue ICSs (where necessary).<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Partial Approval and Disapproval of State Submittals </ITAG>Section 304(l) gives EPA the discretion to approve or disapprove an entirelist of waters or point sources, or to approve or disapprove individualwaters on the list, or individual point sources on the (C) list. EPA hasthe same discretion to approve or disapprove one or more ICSs. The basisfor this conclusion is the requirement in section 304(l) that EPA implementthe listing and ICS requirements of the statute where the state fails tosubmit an ICS in accordance with paragraph section 304(l)(1). Submissionof an ICS in accordance with this paragraph includes listing the waterwhere appropriate, and preparing an adequate ICS. For simplicity EPA hasdecided to refer to approvals or disapprovals of a listed waterbody ratherthan an entire list of waterbodies.As described in section III.B.1 of this preamble, section 304(l) requireseach state to submit three lists of waters to EPA. EPA will review eachwaterbody on each of the three lists. If the waterbody meets the criteriadescribed in the regulations at andSection; 130.10(d) of today's rulemaking,then EPA will approve the state's decision to list that waterbody. If EPAidentifies a waterbody that qualifies for one or more of the three listsof waters, and the state had not included the waterbody on the appropriatelist(s), then EPA will disapprove the state's decision to not list thewaterbody under the applicable paragraph(s) in its notice of approval anddisapproval. For example, if a state included a waterbody on the (A)(i)list, but not on the (B) list, and if EPA determined that the waterbodyqualified for both lists, then EPA would approve the decision to list thewaterbody on the (A)(i) list, but would disapprove the state's decisionto not place the waterbody on the (B) list. Another example is where astate does not include a waterbody on any of the three lists, but EPA determinesthat the waterbody qualifies for one or more of the lists. EPA would disapprovethe state's decision to not list the waterbody under each paragraph forwhich the waterbody qualifies.EPA also has the authority to disapprove the listing of a waterbody bya state if the waterbody does not qualify for the list. For example, ifthe state includes a waterbody on the (B) list, and EPA determines thatthe waterbody does not qualify for the (B) list, EPA would disapprove thestate's listing of the waterbody on the (B) list, and indicate this decisionin EPA's notice of approval or disapproval.EPA will also review each point source on the (C) list. EPA will approvethe listing of each point source that meets the criteria in section 304(l)(1)(C).EPA will disapprove the listing of any point source that does not satisfysection 304(l)(1)(C), and will disapprove a state's decision to not listany point source that meets the criteria in section 304(l)(1)(C).Like EPA's review of individual waters, EPA will review each ICS, and willapprove each ICS submitted by a state that meets the requirements of anICS. EPA will also disapprove a state's decision to not submit an ICS ifEPA determines that the state should have included the ICS in its submittalto EPA. The notice of approval and disapproval, explained in the followingsection, will include EPA's decisions with respect to each water, pointsource, and ICS.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Public Participation</ITAG>The only explicit requirement for public participation in section 304(l)is under section 304(l)(3) of the CWA. Under this section, if a state failsto submit one or more ICSs, or if EPA disapproves one or more ICSs, thenEPA must implement the requirements of section 304(l)(1) within one yearafter notice and opportunity for public comment. This section describesthe additional public participation procedures that EPA will conduct duringthe section 304(l) process. In summary, whether EPA will be required toconduct public participation will depend on two factors: the existenceof either factor will be enough to trigger the notice and comment requirements.The first factor is whether the state conducted adequate public participationin its development of the lists and ICSs: if it did not then EPA will doso. The second factor is whether EPA is disapproving any of a state's decisions:any disapprovals will be subject to public comment. In addition, the regulationsallow the Regional Administrator to request public comment when he believesthat it would be useful. Today's regulations on public participation amendandSection; 130.10(d) (relating to lists of waters), and andSection; 123.46(c)(relating to ICSs).EPA received a number of comments objecting to what the commenters perceivedas a new requirement for public participation in the development of thelists and ICSs under section 304(l). They argued that the states couldnot comply with such a requirement when it was only proposed a short timebefore the lists and ICSs were due. Commenters also argued that section304(l) does not require public participation, and some claimed that EPAdoes not have the authority under the CWA to take public comment on thelists and ICSs. EPA emphasizes that these regulations do not require anystate public participation procedures under section 304(l). Instead theproposed regulations, and the regulations promulgated today, require theRegional Administrators to give the public an opportunity to comment onthe lists and ICSs if the state has not provided such an opportunity. Wherethe state has provided such an opportunity then EPA believes it will beappropriate in many cases to rely on the state's public participation proceduresrather than duplicating them. The principal situation in which the Regionswill take public comment on the state's section 304(l) submissions is whereEPA is disapproving part of a state's submission (in which case EPA willalways provide an opportunity for comment on the disapprovals). There maybe some cases where the state has provided adequate opportunity for comment,and where the Region approves a state's entire submission but the RegionalAdministrator believes that additional public comment will be useful. Thiscould occur if, for example, a Region receives a request from the publicwith reasons why an additional comment period is warranted. In such a casethe regulations leave the decision of whether to provide for comment tothe discretion of the Regional Administrator.EPA received comments questioning its authority to conduct public participationwhere the statute does not specifically require it. EPA believes that section501 provides authority and section 101(e) encourages EPA to provide anopportunity for public participation.One commenter argued that EPA should provide for public comment on EPA'sdecisions for all states. The commenter argued that groups interested inthe section 304(l) process did not know that they would be required torely on only the state participation procedures. EPA is not persuaded bythis argument. First, the guidance published in March 1988 alerted interestedpersons that EPA might rely on state public participation procedures inits review process (see EPA Guidance pp. 35-39). Second, EPA believes thatinterested persons should present all arguments to the states, where anopportunity is provided. In general EPA has a strong commitment to providingadequate public participation in all programs. At the same time EPA wantsto avoid redundant procedures that may simply waste resources of the states,the public and EPA and delay the implemention of section 304(l).EPA intends to rely, to the extent possible, on state public participationprocedures. EPA has encouraged the states to provide for full public participationwhen developing their lists and ICSs under section 304(l). Adequate statepublic participation procedures must, at a minimum, provide for publicnotice and an opportunity to comment on the state's lists and ICSs. Parts25 and 124 of EPA's regulations describe procedures for public notice andcomment that states may use under section 304(l). Where a state does provideadequate public participation on the lists and ICSs, and where the RegionalAdministrator approves all of a state's decisions with respect to the listsand ICSs, today's regulations give the Regional Administrator the discretionto forego an additional round of notice and comment on the lists and ICSs.Where the Regional Administrator determines that a state did not providefor adequate notice and opportunity to comment on the lists and ICSs, EPA'snotice of approval or disapproval must include all approvals and disapprovals.Such notice would include all of EPA's approvals and disapprovals for allwaters and ICSs subject to section 304(l).If a state provides for adequate public participation, but the RegionalAdministrator disapproves any of a state's decisions with respect to thewaters, point sources, or ICSs, then EPA's notice must include each ofthe Agency's disapprovals. In this case it is not necessary for the noticeto include EPA's approvals of a state's decisions under section 304(l).However, the Regional Administrator has the discretion to include EPA'sapprovals in the notice provided under section 304(l). (<T3>See </T3>40 CFR andSection;andSection; 123.46(e) and 130.10(d)(7).)The final rules require the Regional Offices to mail a copy of the noticeto the appropriate state Director. The final rule requires the RegionalAdministrator to publish a notice of availability, either: (a) in a dailyor weekly newspaper with state-wide circulation, or (b) in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. (<T3>See </T3>40 CFR 123.46(e) and 130.10(d)(10).) The notice of availabilitytells the public where to obtain copies of EPA's notice of approval ordisapproval, but in most cases will not list all the approvals and disapprovals.Under today's rules, public participation for the lists and ICSs occursat the same time, and the Regional Offices will probably use the same noticefor the lists and ICSs.EPA is adding the option to substitute <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice for notice in a state newspaper becausein some situations the <T4>Federal Register</T4> may be a more effective way to reach an interestedaudience than a state newspaper. Furthermore, some states do not have anewspaper that has statewide circulation. The notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> will not substitute for the notice that is requiredto be mailed directly to interested persons.EPA considered providing notice and an opportunity for comment on a state'ssubmittal before issuing a notice of approval or disapproval. EPA rejectedthis approach because such notice is not required under section 304(l)and because the ambitious deadlines in section 304(l) preclude public noticeand comment before EPA approves or disapproves a state's lists and ICSs.Some commenters urged EPA to adopt this approach, but EPA remains convincedthat providing an opportunity to comment on decisions during the periodfor petitions (120 days after June 4, 1989) will be sufficient.<T3>a. Contents of EPA's Notice of Approval or Disapproval. </T3>Today'samendments to andSection; 123.46 and to andSection; 130.10(d) describe thecontents of the public notice provided under section 304(l). If the RegionalOffice combines the notice for the lists and ICSs, then each notice wouldinclude the following:1. The name and address of the EPA office that reviews the state's submittals.2. A brief description of the section 304(l) process. For example, thenotice should describe the requirement to identify point sources of toxicpollutants, and should discuss EPA's review of the state's submittal.3. A list of the waters disapproved under paragraph (A)(i), (A)(ii), and(B), and a short finding that the waters do not meet the applicable reviewcriteria.4. A list of point sources disapproved under paragraph (C) of section 304(l)(1),and a short finding that the point sources do not satisfy the criteriaof paragraph (C).5. A list of ICSs disapproved under paragraph (D) of section 304(l)(1)and a short finding that the ICSs do not meet the applicable review criteria.6. If the Regional Administrator determines that a state did not provideadequate public notice and an opportunity to comment on the waters, pointsources, or ICSs prepared under section 304(l), or if the Regional Administratorchooses to exercise his or her discretion, a list of approvals and a shortfinding that the approved waters, point sources, or ICSs meet the applicablereview criteria. 7. The name, address, and telephone number of the person at the RegionalOffice from whom interested parties may obtain more information. 8. The location where interested persons may examine EPA's records of approvalor disapproval.9. Notice that written petitions or comments are due within 120 days.The contents of these notices are similar to the notices given under 40CFR 124.10. EPA believes that by using existing procedures wherever possiblethe agency will minimize the administrative burden of implementing section304(l). EPA's notice of approval or disapproval allows 120 days for public comment.The 120-day comment period coincides with the 120 days described in section304(l)(3), which allows interested persons to petition EPA to list additionalwaters. Under section 304(l)(3), EPA will consider for listing any navigablewater for which any person submits a petition to EPA. Under the statute,interested persons must submit petitions on or before October 4, 1989.Today's rule uses the same 120-day period for receiving petitions and fortaking comments on EPA's notice of approval and disapproval. EPA choseto provide a 120-day comment period because it would be impractical toclose the public comment period on the notice of approval or dispprovalbefore the statutory deadline for petitions. If EPA closed the commentperiod before October 4, 1989, it is possible that the Agency would receivepetitions for additional listings after the close of public comments. b. <T3>Public Hearings. </T3>EPA is not proposing new regulations for publichearings under andSection; 304(l). The 120-day comment period allows sufficientpublic involvement in reviewing EPA's decisions with respect to the listsand ICSs. Furthermore, new regulations for public hearings are not necessarybecause the Regional Administrator may hold a public hearing if he or shefinds a significant degree of public interest in the state's submittal.c. <T3>Petitions for Additional Listings.</T3> Under section 304(l)(3), EPAmust consider petitions from the public for additional listings of navigablewaters. Petitions are due within 120 days after disapproval under section304(l)(3), and should be submitted to the appropriate Regional Administrator.A petition must identify a waterbody with sufficient detail so that EPAis able to determine the location and boundaries of the waterbody. Forexample, the petition could identify the waterbody using the name and numberassigned to the waterbody by EPA's REACH file. The REACH file is a database that includes a geographic description of the nation's surface waters,and the information is available from EPA's Regional Offices. Another methodfor identifying a waterbody is to use the common name for the waterbody,and give the geographic boundaries for the water. The petition must identifythe list or lists for which the waterbody qualifies. The petition mustinclude sufficient supporting information or data to show that the waterbodysatisfies the criteria in section 304(l) of the CWA and 40 CFR andSection;130.10(d)(6). EPA needs this information to evaluate the petition. If EPAdetermines that the petition demonstrates that the water should be listed,and the state has not listed the water, then EPA will disapprove the state'sfailure to list the water. EPA received comments that it should require the petitioner to provideextensive information before EPA would consider the petition. EPA is rejectingthis suggestion because it does not want the petition requirements to beso burdensome as to discourage interested persons from petitioning EPAwith regard to waters that should be listed. At the same time, to grantthe petition, EPA needs sufficient information indicating that the watermeets the criteria for listing in CWA section 304(l) and 40 CFR 130.10(d)(6).This approach will discourage frivolous petitions while at the same timeavoiding a cumbersome process for preparing and submitting petitions. Petitions submitted to EPA pursuant to section 304(l)(3) are limited toadding waters to one or more of the three lists of waters prepared undersection 304(l)(1). Under section 304(l)(3), an interested party may notpetition EPA to delete a water, point source, or ICS from the lists preparedunder section 304(l). The relevant language describing petitions undersection 304(l)(3) limits the petitions to navigable waters ``* * * forlisting under [section 304(l)],'' and does not discuss deleting waters,point sources, or ICSs from the lists prepared under section 304(l). Asa result of the statutory language, the public may submit petitions onlyfor adding waters to one or more lists of waters prepared under section304(l). d. <T3>Response to Comments and Petitions. </T3>After the close of the publiccomment period on October 4, 1989 the Regional Offices will provide, assoon as practicable but not later than June 4, 1990, a response to thecomments and petitions received. In most cases the response to commentswill represent the Agency's final decisions with respect to the contentof the lists prepared under section 304(l)(1). The response to commentswill be given in the same manner as the first notice. The contents of theresponse to comments are the same as the first notice of approval or disapprovalexcept for the following changes: 1. The lists of disapproved waters, point sources, and ICSs must reflectany changes made pursuant to comments or petitions received. 2. A brief summary of major comments and petitions received, and EPA'sresponse to the comment or petition.3. A brief description of the subsequent steps in the section 304(l) process.Interested persons will have an additional opportunity to comment on disapprovedICSs. Where EPA disapproves an ICS because it does not meet the requirementsof section 304(l), or because the state failed to submit the ICS to EPAfor review, section 304(l) requires EPA to prepare an ICS in cooperationwith the state after notice and an opportunity to comment. The public noticerequirements of section 304(l)(3) will be fulfilled by the public noticeprocedures followed by EPA or the state when issuing the permit that willconstitute the ICS. If EPA disapproves one or more ICSs, then EPA or thestate may modify, revoke and reissue, or terminate that ICS using the proceduresin 40 CFR Part 124. The procedures in Part 124 require the permitting authorityto provide for public notice and an opportunity to comment before issuinga final permit. Therefore, if the permitting authority modifies, revokesand reissues, or terminates a disapproved ICS, the permitting authoritymust provide for public notice and an opportunity to comment. At any timeafter the Regional Administrator disapproves an ICS (or conditionally approvesa draft permit as an ICS), the Regional Office may submit a written notificationto the state that the Regional Office intends to issue the ICS. Upon mailingthe notification to the state, exclusive authority to issue the permitpasses to EPA. This issue is addressed in today's regulations at 40 CFRandSection;123.46(f). EPA is promulgating this regulation to clarify thetime at which exclusive authority to issue ICSs passes to EPA under section304(l).<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Subsequent Steps in the section 304(l) Process</ITAG>a. <T3>EPA Implementation of section 304(l).</T3> Where EPA disapproves astate's decision with respect to a waterbody or an ICS it is under an obligationto implement section 304(l) in cooperation with the state. Some commentersquestioned whether EPA's process allowed for full cooperation with thestates. EPA proposed, and is finalizing a procedure that will allow EPAto assume the authority to issue a permit that is disapproved as an ICS(or one that the state did not submit). The rule allows EPA's RegionalOffice to notify the state that it will issue the permit where the ICSis disapproved. EPA rejected requiring the exclusive permitting authorityto revert automatically to EPA in order to allow ample opportunity forthe region to negotiate with the state regarding each permit. At the sametime EPA is mindful of the necessity of expediting the permit-issuanceprocess where agreement cannot be reached with the state, especially consideringthat Congress has imposed deadlines for the issuance of the ICSs and theimplementation of the effluent limits. Therefore EPA is retaining the approachin the proposal which allowed EPA to assume permitting jurisdiction uponnotice to the state. In issuing the permit EPA will follow its normal permit-issuanceprocedures including requesting certification under section 401 of theCWA.For listing, EPA will solicit public comment on the waters and point sourcesthat were disapproved by EPA. (In most cases, these will be waters andpoint sources that EPA believes that the state should have included onone or more of its lists, but did not.) If the state has not provided adequatepublic notice on the lists, EPA will solicit public notice on all watersand point sources, both approved and disapproved. Until EPA takes finalAgency action with regard to the lists, EPA will continue to cooperatewith the state to decide which waters and point sources should appear onthe lists. EPA may add or delete waters in response to public commentsor additional data and information received during the time before itsfinal decision on the lists. EPA will make these decisions public as finalAgency action as expeditiously as possible after the public comment periodcloses, but no later than June 4, 1990, in the same manner as it providespublic notice in June, 1989. This final Agency action constitutes promulgationby EPA of the lists. EPA believes it is critical that the Agency establishesthese lists as final as soon as possible in order to begin developmentof individual control strategies in time to be finished by June 4, 1990,as required by the CWA.b. <T3>Judicial Review of Decision Under section 304(l). </T3>As EPA statedin the proposal, judicial review of a disapproved ICS under section 509(b)of the CWA is not available until EPA makes a final decision with respectto the ICS, i.e., a final decision on the EPA-issued NPDES permit underPart 124 of EPA's regulations. One commenter argued that EPA's positionon this issue further undermined its definition of an ICS by making 509(b)(1)(G)redundant. Within the limits of the Act, the Agency has the discretionto define ICSs as discussed above in Section C.1. The Agency continuesto believe that its definition is the best reading of the statute, andCongress gave EPA discretion in determining what exact definition to use.Congress' addition of section 509(b)(1)(G) to the Act shows Congress' intentthat EPA's promulgation of an ICS, however defined, be reviewed in thecourts of appeals more than any intent to preclude or restrict EPA's interpretationthat an NPDES permit be an ICS. Therefore, EPA believes that the permitsthat EPA issues as ICSs are reviewable in the court of appeals. Reviewof any other actions by EPA under section 304(l) must be obtained in adistrict court.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Effective Date</ITAG>This rule became effective on May 26, 1989. Title 5 U.S.C. 553(d) providesthat regulations should take effect 30 days after their publication inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4>, unless EPA finds and publishes good cause fora shorter time. In determining that good cause exists in this case, EPAweighed the necessity for an immediate effective date against problemsit would cause for those subject to the rules. The need for an immediateeffective date arises from the statute's deadline for EPA decisions onstate submissions. It is critical that today's rule be effective when EPA'sRegional Offices make their decisions under section 304(l). Today's regulationsare important to ensure consistency and certainty in regional decisions.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Regulatory Analysis</ITAG>A. Executive Order 12291Under section 3(b) of Executive Order 12291 the agency must judge whethera regulation is major and thus subject to the requirements of a RegulatoryImpact Analysis. The regulation published today is not major because therule will not result in an effect on the economy of $100 million or more,will not result in increased costs or prices, will not have significantadverse effects on competition, employment, investment, productivity, andinnovation, and will not significantly disrupt domestic or export markets.EPA received comments arguing that the regulations were in fact major.EPA disagrees. The regulations specify what factors states must use todetermine whether permits will achieve water quality standards, while thedetermination of what the standards are and what permit limits are necessaryto comply with the standards remains principally with the states. Compliancewith the water quality standards has been required by the Clean Water Actsince July 1, 1977. Many of the limits that are imposed as a result ofthe procedures in today's rule are to implement standards that were inplace long ago. The reporting requirements discussed in today's rule requireno additional monitoring, and preparing the reports will not result inan effect on the economy of $100 million or more.Therefore, the Agency has not prepared a Regulatory Impact Analysis underthe Executive Order. EPA submitted this regulation to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review as required by Executive Order 12291.B. Paperwork Reduction ActThere is no information collection requirement after the effective dateof this rulemaking, and, therefore, no information collection request andclearance are needed. An information collection request for the proposedrulemaking, submitted by EPA to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)was disapproved by OMB because the information had already been submittedto EPA pursuant to the statutory deadline of February 4, 1989, and EPAdid not formally submit the ICR in a timely manner after the proposed rulewas published (<T3>see</T3> PRA regulations 5 CFR 1320.13 (b) and (d)).The comments from OMB regarding the ICR for the proposed rule are availablefrom the Chief, Information Policy Branch, PM-223, U.S. EPA, 401 M StreetSW., Washington, DC 20460; and the Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.C. Regulatory Flexibility ActUnder the Regulatory Flexibility Act of 1980 (5 U.S.C. 601 et seq.), Federalagencies must, when developing regulations, analyze their impact on smallentities (small businesses, small government jurisdictions, and small organizations).This analysis is unnecessary, however, where the agency's administratorcertifies that the rule will not have a significant economic effect ona substantial number of small entities. The agency has concluded that thisrule will not have a significant economic effect on a substantial numberof small entities because today's rulemaking imposes no new requirementsfor the regulated community. Today's regulations merely establish the proceduresfor implementing section 304(1) of the CWA, and clarify certain elementsof EPA's surface water toxics control program.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>40 CFR Part 122EPA Administered Permit Programs: The National Pollutant Discharge EliminationSystem.40 CFR Part 123State program requirements.40 CFR Part 130Water quality planning and management.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: May 26, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">F. Henry Habicht II, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 122_EPA ADMINISTERED PERMIT PROGRAMS: THE NATIONAL POLLUTANTDISCHARGE ELIMINATION SYSTEM</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 122 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> The Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.</T3> </ITAG>2. Section 122.2 is amended by adding in alphabetical order a new definitionas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 122.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Whole effluent toxicity</T3> means the aggregate toxic effect of aneffluent measured directly by a toxicity test.3. Paragraph (d)(1) of andSection; 122.44 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 122.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishing limitations, standards, and other permit conditions (applicableto State NPDES programs, see andSection; 123.25).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(1) Achieve water quality standards established under section 303 of theCWA, including State narrative criteria for water quality.(i) Limitations must control all pollutants or pollutant parameters (eitherconventional, nonconventional, or toxic pollutants) which the Directordetermines are or may be discharged at a level which will cause, have thereasonable potential to cause, or contribute to an excursion above anyState water quality standard, including State narrative criteria for waterquality.(ii) When determining whether a discharge causes, has the reasonable potentialto cause, or contributes to an in-stream excursion above a narrative ornumeric criteria within a State water quality standard, the permittingauthority shall use procedures which account for existing controls on pointand nonpoint sources of pollution, the variability of the pollutant orpollutant parameter in the effluent, the sensitivity of the species totoxicity testing (when evaluating whole effluent toxicity), and where appropriate,the dilution of the effluent in the receiving water.(iii) When the permitting authority determines, using the procedures inparagraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section, that a discharge causes, has thereasonable potential to cause, or contributes to an in-stream excursionabove the allowable ambient concentration of a State numeric criteria withina State water quality standard for an individual pollutant, the permitmust contain effluent limits for that pollutant.(iv) When the permitting authority determines, using the procedures inparagraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section, that a discharge causes, has thereasonable potential to cause, or contributes to an in-stream excursionabove the numeric criterion for whole effluent toxicity, the permit mustcontain effluent limits for whole effluent toxicity.(v) Except as provided in this subparagraph, when the permitting authoritydetermines, using the procedures in paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section,toxicity testing data, or other information, that a discharge causes, hasthe reasonable potential to cause, or contributes to an in-stream excursionabove a narrative criterion within an applicable State water quality standard,the permit must contain effluent limits for whole effluent toxicity. Limitson whole effluent toxicity are not necessary where the permitting authoritydemonstrates in the fact sheet or statement of basis of the NPDES permit,using the procedures in paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section, that chemical-specificlimits for the effluent are sufficient to attain and maintain applicablenumeric and narrative State water quality standards.(vi) Where a State has not established a water quality criterion for aspecific chemical pollutant that is present in an effluent at a concentrationthat causes, has the reasonable potential to cause, or contributes to anexcursion above a narrative criterion within an applicable State waterquality standard, the permitting authority must establish effluent limitsusing one or more of the following options:(A) Establish effluent limits using a calculated numeric water qualitycriterion for the pollutant which the permitting authority demonstrateswill attain and maintain applicable narrative water quality criteria andwill fully protect the designated use. Such a criterion may be derivedusing a proposed State criterion, or an explicit State policy or regulationinterpreting its narrative water quality criterion, supplemented with otherrelevant information which may include: EPA's Water Quality Standards Handbook,October 1983, risk assessment data, exposure data, information about thepollutant from the Food and Drug Administration, and current EPA criteriadocuments; or(B) Establish effluent limits on a case-by-case basis, using EPA's waterquality criteria, published under section 307(a) of the CWA, supplementedwhere necessary by other relevant information; or(C) Establish effluent limitations on an indicator parameter for the pollutantof concern, provided:(<T3>1</T3>) The permit identifies which pollutants are intended to be controlledby the use of the effluent limitation;(<T3>2</T3>) The fact sheet required by andSection; 124.56 sets forth thebasis for the limit, including a finding that compliance with the effluentlimit on the indicator parameter will result in controls on the pollutantof concern which are sufficient to attain and maintain applicable waterquality standards;(<T3>3</T3>) The permit requires all effluent and ambient monitoring necessaryto show that during the term of the permit the limit on the indicator parametercontinues to attain and maintain applicable water quality standards; and(<T3>4</T3>) The permit contains a reopener clause allowing the permittingauthority to modify or revoke and reissue the permit if the limits on theindicator parameter no longer attain and maintain applicable water qualitystandards.(vii) When developing water quality-based effluent limits under this paragraphthe permitting authority shall ensure that:(A) The level of water quality to be achieved by limits on point sourcesestablished under this paragraph is derived from, and complies with allapplicable water quality standards; and(B) Effluent limits developed to protect a narrative water quality criterion,a numeric water quality criterion, or both, are consistent with the assumptionsand requirements of any available wasteload allocation for the dischargeprepared by the State and approved by EPA pursuant to 40 CFR 130.7.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>4. The title of paragraph (e) of andSection; 122.44 is revised to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) <T3>Technology-based controls for toxic pollutants.</T3> * * *<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 123_STATE PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 123 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG>2. Section 123.44 is amended by adding paragraph (c)(8) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 123.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPA review of and objections to State permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(8) The effluent limits of a permit fail to satisfy the requirements of40 CFR 122.44(d).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. In andSection; 123.46 paragraph (a) is revised and paragraphs (c), (d),(e) and (f) are added, as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 123.46</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Individual control strategies.</ITAG>(a) Not later than February 4, 1989, each State shall submit to the RegionalAdministrator for review, approval, and implementation an individual controlstrategy for each point source identified by the State pursuant to section304(l)(1)(C) of the Act which will produce a reduction in the dischargeof toxic pollutants from the point sources identified under section 304(l)(1)(C)through the establishment of effluent limitations under section 402 ofthe CWA and water quality standards under section 303(c)(2)(B) of the CWA,which reduction is sufficient, in combination with existing controls onpoint and nonpoint sources of pollution, to achieve the applicable waterquality standard as soon as possible, but not later than three years afterthe date of the establishment of such strategy.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) For the purposes of this section the term individual control strategy,as set forth in section 304(l) of the CWA, means a final NPDES permit withsupporting documentation showing that effluent limits are consistent withan approved wasteload allocation, or other documentation which shows thatapplicable water quality standards will be met not later than three yearsafter the individual control strategy is established. Where a State isunable to issue a final permit on or before February 4, 1989, an individualcontrol strategy may be a draft permit with an attached schedule (providedthe State meets the schedule for issuing the final permit) indicating thatthe permit will be issued on or before February 4, 1990. If a point sourceis subject to section 304(l)(1)(C) of the CWA and is also subject to anon-site response action under sections 104 or 106 of the ComprehensiveEnvironmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA),(42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq.), an individual control strategy may be the decisiondocument (which incorporates the applicable or relevant and appropriaterequirements under the CWA) prepared under sections 104 or 106 of CERCLAto address the release or threatened release of hazardous substances tothe environment.(d) A petition submitted pursuant to section 304(l)(3) of the CWA mustbe submitted to the appropriate Regional Administrator. Petitions mustidentify a waterbody in sufficient detail so that EPA is able to determinethe location and boundaries of the waterbody. The petition must also identifythe list or lists for which the waterbody qualifies, and the petition mustexplain why the waterbody satisfies the criteria for listing under CWAsection 304(l) and 40 CFR 130.10(d)(6).(e) If the Regional Administrator disapproves one or more individual controlstrategies, or if a State fails to provide adequate public notice and anopportunity to comment on the ICSs, then, not later than June 4, 1989,the Regional Administrator shall give a notice of approval or disapprovalof the individual control strategies submitted by each State pursuant tothis section as follows:(1) The notice of approval or disapproval given under this paragraph shallinclude the following:(i) The name and address of the EPA office that reviews the State's submittals.(ii) A brief description of the section 304(l) process.(iii) A list of ICSs disapproved under this section and a finding thatthe ICSs will not meet all applicable review criteria under this sectionand section 304(l) of the CWA.(iv) If the Regional Administrator determines that a State did not provideadequate public notice and an opportunity to comment on the waters, pointsources, or ICSs prepared pursuant to section 304(l), or if the RegionalAdministrator chooses to exercise his or her discretion, a list of theICSs approved under this section, and a finding that the ICSs satisfy allapplicable review criteria.(v) The location where interested persons may examine EPA's records ofapproval and disapproval.(vi) The name, address, and telephone number of the person at the RegionalOffice from whom interested persons may obtain more information.(vii) Notice that written petitions or comments are due within 120 days.(2) The Regional Administrator shall provide the notice of approval ordisapproval given under this paragraph to the appropriate State Director.The Regional Administrator shall publish a notice of availability, in adaily or weekly newspaper with State-wide circulation or in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, for the notice of approval or disapproval. TheRegional Administrator shall also provide written notice to each dischargeridentified under section 304(l)(1)(C), that EPA has listed the dischargerunder section 304(l)(1)(C).(3) As soon as practicable but not later than June 4, 1990, the RegionalOffices shall issue a response to petitions or comments received undersection 304(l). The response to comments shall be given in the same manneras the notice described in paragraph (e) of this section except for thefollowing changes:(i) The lists of ICSs reflecting any changes made pursuant to commentsor petitions received.(ii) A brief description of the subsequent steps in the section 304(l)process.(f) EPA shall review, and approve or disapprove, the individual controlstrategies prepared under section 304(l) of the CWA, using the applicablecriteria set forth in section 304(l) of the CWA, and in 40 CFR Part 122,including andSection;122.44(d). At any time after the Regional Administratordisapproves an ICS (or conditionally aproves a draft permit as an ICS),the Regional Office may submit a written notification to the State thatthe Regional Office intends to issue the ICS. Upon mailing the notification,and notwithstanding any other regulation, exclusive authority to issuethe permit passes to EPA.4. Section 123.63 is amended by adding paragraph (a)(5) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;123.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for withdrawal of state programs.</ITAG>(a) * * *(5) Where the State fails to develop an adequate regulatory program fordeveloping water quality-based effluent limits in NPDES permits.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 130_WATER QUALITY PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 130 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>2. Section 130.10 is amended by adding paragraphs (d)(4), (d)(5), (d)(6),(d)(7), (d)(8), (d)(9), (d)(10), and (d)(11) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;130.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">State submittals to EPA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(4) For the purposes of listing waters under andSection;130.10(d)(2), ``applicablestandard'' means a numeric criterion for a priority pollutant promulgatedas part of a state water quality standard. Where a state numeric criterionfor a priority pollutant is not promulgated as part of a state water qualitystandard, for the purposes of listing waters ``applicable standard'' meansthe state narrative water quality criterion to control a priority pollutant(e.g., no toxics in toxic amounts) interpreted on a chemical-by-chemicalbasis by applying a proposed state cirterion, an explicit state policyor regulation, or an EPA national water quality criterion, supplementedwith other relevant information.(5) If a water meets either of the two conditions listed below the watermust be listed under andSection;130.10(d)(2) on the grounds that the applicablestandard is not achieved or expected to be achieved due entirely or substantiallyto discharges from point sources.(i) Existing or additional water quality-based limits on one or more pointsources would result in the achievement of an applicable water qualitystandard for a toxic pollutant; or(ii) The discharge of a toxic pollutant from one or more point sources,regardless of any nonpoint source contribution of the same pollutant, issufficient to cause or is expected to cause an excursion above the applicablewater quality standard for the toxic pollutant.(6) Each state shall assemble and evaluate all existing and readily availablewater quality-related data and information and each state shall developthe lists required by paragraphs (d)(1), (2), and (3) of this section basedupon this data and information. At a minimum, all existing and readilyavailable water quality-related data and information includes, but is notlimited to, all of the existing and readily available data about the followingcategories of waters in the state:(i) Waters where fishing or shellfish bans and/or advisories are currentlyin effect or are anticipated.(ii) Waters where there have been repeated fishkills or where abnormalities(cancers, lesions, tumors, etc.) have been observed in fish or other aquaticlife during the last ten years.(iii) Waters where there are restrictions on water sports or recreationalcontact.(iv) Waters identified by the state in its most recent state section 305(b)report as either ``partially achieving'' or ``not achieving'' designateduses.(v) Waters identified by the states under section 303(d) of the CWA aswaters needing water quality-based controls.(vi) Waters identified by the state as priority waterbodies. (State WaterQuality Management plans often include priority waterbody lists which arethose waters that most need water pollution control decisions to achievewater quality standards or goals.)(vii) Waters where ambient data indicate potential or actual exceedancesof water quality criteria due to toxic pollutants from an industry classifiedas a primary industry in Appendix A of 40 CFR Part 122. (viii) Waters for which effluent toxicity test results indicate possibleor actual exceedances of state water quality standards, including narrative``free from'' water quality criteria or EPA water quality criteria wherestate criteria are not available. (ix) Waters with primary industrial major dischargers where dilution analysesindicate exceedances of state narrative or numeric water quality criteria(or EPA water quality criteria where state standards are not available)for toxic pollutants, ammonia, or chlorine. These dilution analyses mustbe based on estimates of discharge levels derived from effluent guidelinesdevelopment documents, NPDES permits or permit application data (e.g.,Form 2C), Discharge Monitoring Reports (DMRs), or other available information.(x) Waters with POTW dischargers requiring local pretreatment programswhere dilution analyses indicate exceedances of state water quality criteria(or EPA water quality criteria where state water quality criteria are notavailable) for toxic pollutants, ammonia, or chlorine. These dilution analysesmust be based upon data from NPDES permits or permit applications (e.g.,Form 2C), Discharge Monitoring Reports (DMRs), or other available information.(xi) Waters with facilities not included in the previous two categoriessuch as major POTWs, and industrial minor dischargers where dilution analysesindicate exceedances of numeric or narrative state water quality criteria(or EPA water quality criteria where state water quality criteria are notavailable) for toxic pollutants, ammonia, or chlorine. These dilution analysesmust be based upon estimates of discharge levels derived from effluentguideline development documents, NPDES permits or permit application data,Discharge Monitoring Reports (DMRs), or other available information. (xii) Waters classified for uses that will not support the ``fishable/swimmable''goals of the Clean Water Act. (xiii) Waters where ambient toxicity or adverse water quality conditionshave been reported by local, state, EPA or other Federal Agencies, theprivate sector, public interest groups, or universities. These organizationsand groups should be actively solicited for research they may be conductingor reporting. For example, university researchers, the United States Departmentof Agriculture, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, theUnited States Geological Survey, and the United States Fish and WildlifeService are good sources of field data and research. (xiv) Waters identified by the state as impaired in its most recent CleanLake Assessments conducted under section 314 of the Clean Water Act. (xv) Waters identified as impaired by nonpoint sources in the <T3>America's Clean Water: The States' Nonpoint Source Assessments</T3>1985 (Association of State and Interstate Water Pollution Control Administrators(ASIWPCA)) or waters identified as impaired or threatened in a nonpointsource assessment submitted by the state to EPA under section 319 of theClean Water Act. (xvi) Surface waters impaired by pollutants from hazardous waste siteson the National Priority List prepared under section 105(8)(A) of CERCLA.(7) Each state shall provide documentation to the Regional Administratorto support the state's determination to list or not to list waters as requiredby paragraphs (d)(1), (d)(2) and (d)(3) of this section. This documentationshall be submitted to the Regional Administrator together with the listsrequired by paragraphs (d)(1), (d)(2), and (d)(3) of this section and shallinclude as a minimum: (i) A description of the methodology used to develop each list; (ii) A description of the data and information used to identify watersand sources including a description of the data and information used bythe state as required by paragraph (d)(6) of this section; (iii) A rationale for any decision not to use any one of the categoriesof existing and readily available data required by paragraph (d)(6) ofthis section; and (iv) Any other information requested by the Regional Administrator thatis reasonable or necessary to determine the adequacy of a state's lists.Upon request by the Regional Administrator, each state must demonstrategood cause for not including a water or waters on one or more lists. Goodcause includes, but is not limited to, more recent or accurate data; moreaccurate water quality modeling; flaws in the original analysis that ledto the water being identified in a category in andSection; 130.10(d)(6);or changes in conditions, e.g., new control equipment, or elimination ofdischarges. (8) The Regional Administrator shall approve or disapprove each list requiredby paragraphs (d)(1), (d)(2), and (d)(3) of this section no later thanJune 4, 1989. The Regional Administrator shall approve each list requiredunder paragraphs (d)(1), (d)(2), and (d)(3) of this section only if itmeets the regulatory requirements for listing under paragraphs (d)(1),(d)(2), and (d)(3) of this section and if the state has met all the requirementsof paragraphs (d)(6) and (d)(7) of this section.(9) If a state fails to submit lists in accordance with paragraph (d) ofthis section or the Regional Administrator does not approve the lists submittedby such state in accordance with this paragraph, then not later than June4, 1990, the Regional Administrator, in cooperation with such state, shallimplement the requirements of CWA section 304(l) (1) and (2) in such state.(10) If the Regional Administrator disapproves a state's decision withrespect to one or more of the waters required under paragraph (d) (1),(2), or (3) of this section, or one or more of the individual control strategiesrequired pursuant to section 304(l)(1)(D), then not later than June 4,1989, the Regional Administrator shall distribute the notice of approvalor disapproval given under this paragraph to the appropriate state Director.The Regional Administrator shall also publish a notice of availability,in a daily or weekly newspaper with state-wide circulation or in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, for the notice of approval or disapproval. TheRegional Administrator shall also provide written notice to each dischargeridentified under section 304(l)(1)(C), that EPA has listed the dischargerunder section 304(l)(1)(C). The notice of approval and disapproval shallinclude the following: (i) The name and address of the EPA office that reviews the state's submittals.(ii) A brief description of the section 304(l) process. (iii) A list of waters, point sources and pollutants disapproved underthis paragraph. (iv) If the Regional Administrator determines that a state did not provideadequate public notice and an opportunity to comment on the lists preparedunder this section, or if the Regional Administrator chooses to exercisehis or her discretion, a list of waters, point sources, or pollutants approvedunder this paragraph. (v) The name, address, and telephone number of the person at the RegionalOffice from whom interested persons may obtain more information. (vi) Notice that written petitions or comments are due within 120 days.(11) As soon as practicable, but not later than June 4, 1990, the RegionalOffice shall issue a response to petitions or comments received under paragraph(d)(10) of this section. Notice shall be given in the same manner as noticedescribed in paragraph (d)(10) of this section, except for the followingchanges to the notice of approvals and disapprovals: (i) The lists of waters, point sources and pollutants must reflect anychanges made pursuant to comments or petitions received. (ii) A brief description of the subsequent steps in the section 304(l)process shall be included.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-13160 Filed 6-1-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>